Privacy Policy
Mariusz Rumak built the Case Battle app as an Ad Supported app. This SERVICE is provided by
                    Mariusz Rumak at no cost and is intended for use as is.
This page is used to inform visitors regarding our policies with the collection, use, and disclosure
                    of Personal Information if anyone decided to use our Service.
If you choose to use our Service, then you agree to the collection and use of information in
                    relation to this policy. The Personal Information that we collect is used for providing and improving
                    the Service. We will not use or share your information with anyone except as described
                    in this Privacy Policy.
The terms used in this Privacy Policy have the same meanings as in our Terms and Conditions, which is
                    accessible at Case Battle unless otherwise defined in this Privacy Policy.
Information Collection and Use
For a better experience, while using our Service, we may require you to provide us with certain
                    personally identifiable information. The information that we request will be retained by us and used as described in this privacy policy.
The app does use third party services that may collect information used to identify you.
Link to privacy policy of third party service providers used by the app
IronSource Privacy Policy
Applovin Privacy Policy
Unity GDPR
Unity Privacy Policy
AdMob Privacy Policy
AdMob GDPR
Facebook Privacy Policy
Appodeal Privacy Policy
Log Data
We want to inform you that whenever you use our Service, in a case of
                    an error in the app we collect data and information (through third party products) on your phone
                    called Log Data. This Log Data may include information such as your device Internet Protocol (“IP”) address,
                    device name, operating system version, the configuration of the app when utilizing our Service,
                    the time and date of your use of the Service, and other statistics.
Game Data
This Service may collect some data for improve app:
Player statistics (nickname, progress data, unique identifier (“ID”), device identifier (“ID”), facebook identifier (“ID”), Name, Email, Internet Protocol (“IP”) address)
Information about illegal software that facilitates the game (root or jailbreak)
Information about paths or packages to detect illegal software
Facebook Data
You can log in to our Services using sign-in services such as Facebook Connect. This will give you option to cloud save your data on our server. We collect only
facebook identifier
(“ID”), Name and Email.
Remove Data
If you want us to remove/delete the data we receive from Facebook or other services please contact us via email:
shadowdev485@gmail.com
Please include this informations in email:
Subject:
Request data remove (Case Battle)
Your
unique identifier (“ID”)
+ screenshot from settings in game
If you used
Facebook Connect
please include
facebook identifier
(“ID”)
Skins CS:GO
We want to inform you that all skins found in this case simulator cannot be transferred to your real inventory in game 
				   Counter-Strike: Global Offensive (CS:GO). All rights to skins belong to the Valve Corporation.
Cookies
Cookies are files with a small amount of data that are commonly used as anonymous unique identifiers.
                    These are sent to your browser from the websites that you visit and are stored on your device's internal
                    memory.
This Service does not use these “cookies” explicitly. However, the app may use third party code and
                    libraries that use “cookies” to collect information and improve their services. You have the option to
                    either accept or refuse these cookies and know when a cookie is being sent to your device. If you choose
                    to refuse our cookies, you may not be able to use some portions of this Service.
Service Providers
We may employ third-party companies and individuals due to the following reasons:
To facilitate our Service;
To provide the Service on our behalf;
To perform Service-related services; or
To assist us in analyzing how our Service is used.
We want to inform users of this Service that these third parties have access to
                    your Personal Information. The reason is to perform the tasks assigned to them on our behalf. However,
                    they are obligated not to disclose or use the information for any other purpose.
Security
We value your trust in providing us your Personal Information, thus we are striving
                    to use commercially acceptable means of protecting it. But remember that no method of transmission over
                    the internet, or method of electronic storage is 100% secure and reliable, and we cannot guarantee
                    its absolute security.
Links to Other Sites
This Service may contain links to other sites. If you click on a third-party link, you will be directed
                    to that site. Note that these external sites are not operated by us. Therefore, we strongly
                    advise you to review the Privacy Policy of these websites. We have no control over
                    and assume no responsibility for the content, privacy policies, or practices of any third-party sites
                    or services.
Children’s Privacy
These Services do not address anyone under the age of 13. We do not knowingly collect
                    personally identifiable information from children under 13. In the case we discover that a child
                    under 13 has provided us with personal information, we immediately delete this from
                    our servers. If you are a parent or guardian and you are aware that your child has provided us with personal
                    information, please contact us so that we will be able to do necessary actions.
Rules IN-GAME
Each player should play legally, without the use of cheats or software bugs. Failure to follow this rule may result in blocking the player.
Changes to This Privacy Policy
We may update our Privacy Policy from time to time. Thus, you are advised to review
                    this page periodically for any changes. We will notify you of any changes by posting
                    the new Privacy Policy on this page. These changes are effective immediately after they are posted on
                    this page.
Contact Us
If you have any questions or suggestions about our Privacy Policy, do not hesitate to contact
                    us.
Contact:
shadowdev485@gmail.com
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
http://www.ironsrc.com/wp-content/uploads/2019/03/ironSource-Privacy-Policy.pdf:
Please note: This website includes an accessibility system. Press Control-F11 to adjust the website to the visually impaired who are using a screen reader; Press Control-F10 to open an accessibility menu.
Accessibility
Popup heading
Close
Press
‎
↵ Enter
‎
for Accessibility for blind people
who use screen readers
Press
‎
↵ Enter
‎
for Keyboard Navigation
Press
‎
↵ Enter
‎
for Accessibility menu



en
jp
cn
kr
Platform
Monetization
Marketing
Analytics
Publishing
Products
Unity LevelPlay
Mediation
ironSource Network
Ad network
Tapjoy
Offerwall
Aura
On-device solutions
Supersonic
Publishing
Luna
Cross-channel management
Learn
Community
Blog
Case studies
LevelUp Academy
Knowledge center
Glossary
Company
About
Careers
Newsroom
Contact us
Log into Tapjoy
Login
Login
Signup
Signup
Customer support
Customer support
ironSource has merged with Unity
Our platform
User growth
Scale up your user base with ROI positive campaigns that connect you to users who are in it for the long-haul
Check out our growth solutions
Check out our growth solutions
Monetization
Increase your app’s ARPDAU and maximize the value of your users with powerful ad mediation and high-impact ad formats
Learn about our monetization solutions
Learn about our monetization solutions
Analytics
Make optimization quicker and easier with analytics that help you better understand your app’s performance from every angle
See the analytics we offer
See the analytics we offer
Creative management
Leverage our creative production tools to boost your creative performance and delight your users
Check out our creative firepower
Check out our creative firepower
Publishing
Take your games to the top of the charts – and stay there – with our publishing solutions
Get to know our publishing team
Get to know our publishing team
For telecom operators
Aura enables digital transformation for the world’s leading telecom operators and OEMs, allowing them to engage their customers with relevant content, apps, and services across the entire lifecycle of the device
Discover Aura
Discover Aura
Baris Aygoren, Performance Marketing Director at King
“ironSource’s user growth solution not only delivered great ROAS and quality, but also made our internal optimization processes more efficient. ironSource is an integral part of our growth strategy”
View case study
View case study
Scott Koenigsberg, SVP, Head of Product at Zynga
“ironSource has been a key partner for Zynga for several years, and their platform has played an integral role in driving sustainable growth for our titles, from launch through to the long-term”
Rohan Verma, Director of User Acquisition at Calm
“ironSource’s creative management solution has been a major boost for our UA. They’ve been a true partner in helping us optimize performance and leverage data-driven insights to fuel growth”
Mike Brooks, SVP Revenue at Weatherbug
“There are few channels with the strategic positioning, scale, and efficacy that Aura provides, and we’re as excited as ever to continue our multi-year partnership”
Evgeniy Sidorov, Lead Game Producer for Join Clash
“The amazing work that we did together with Supersonic on Join Clash took us all the way to the #2 spot in the US charts while maintaining significant profit along the entire way”
View case study
View case study
Pawel Czartotyjski, Product Marketing Director at Orange
“ironSource Aura enables us to optimize the content experience throughout the life cycle of the device, which translates into a superior user experience for our customers”
The latest from ironSource
Blog
2025 Mobile gaming trends: Unity perspectives
Read more >>
eBook
Understanding the mobile gaming and fast food connection
Read more >>
Podcast
How Tilting Point is unlocking the value of D2C webstores
Read more >>
About ironSource
ironSource is the leading business platform for the app economy. Our mission is to help any app developer turn their app into a scalable, successful business.
Get to know us
Get to know us
Supersonic Studios
One of the most downloaded game publishers in the world, Supersonic’s unique publishing technology is behind 41 top 10 hits
Discover Supersonic
Discover Supersonic
Build your way at ironSource
At ironSource, we don’t just build the code – we all have a hand in building the company, too. Join our growing team to make an impact on millions of users around the world
See our open positions
See our open positions
Learn how ironSource can help you scale your business
Contact us
Contact us
By clicking “Accept Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts.
Cookie Settings
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Your Opt Out Preference Signal is Honored
Your Privacy
Functional Cookies
Performance Cookies
Strictly Necessary Cookies
Targeting Cookies
Your Privacy
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
Functional Cookies
Inactive
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Performance Cookies
Inactive
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Cookies Details‎
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Cookies Details‎
Targeting Cookies
Inactive
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising. Some 3rd party video providers do not allow video views without targeting cookies. If you are experiencing difficulty viewing a video, you will need to set your cookie preferences for targeting to yes if you wish to view videos from these providers. Unity does not control this.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Filter Button
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Sub-policy 1
https://www.applovin.com/privacy/:
Products
AppDiscovery
Acquire your ideal users
MAX
Monetize your app
SparkLabs
Create ads that perform
AppLovin Exchange
Reach your audience
Array
Increase value across customer’s lifecycle
Adjust
Measure your marketing
Wurl
Our streaming TV solution
Solutions
Increase ARPDAU
Grow Ad Inventory
Acquire App Users
Increase IAPs
Resources
Success Stories
Blog
Video Library
Guides and Reports
Glossary
Events
Partners
View all resources
More about us
Jobs
NEW
Press
About Us
Sign Up
Sign In
ENG
中文
日本語
한국어
Privacy Policy
Overview
Policies
Privacy Policy
隐私政策
Datenschutzerklärung
プライバシーポリシー
개인정보 보호 정책
Política de Privacidade
Politique de confidentialité
AppLovin Partners
AppLovin Policies for Publishers
AppLovin Policies for Demand Partners
AppLovin Array Privacy Policy
Terms
Terms of Use
使用协议条款
Vereinbarung über die Nutzungsbedingungen
利用規約
이용 약관 계약
Contrato de Termos de Uso
Accord sur les Conditions d’utilisation
DMCA Notice
End User License Agreement — Software
AppLovin Array Terms of Service
APPLOVIN PLATFORM DATA PROCESSING AGREEMENT
AppLovin Demand Partner Data Processing Agreement
Effective Date
: October 30, 2024
You can find the prior version
here
.
AppLovin Corporation (“we,” “us,” “our,” or “AppLovin”) operates a suite of tools for app developers and other businesses to automate and optimize the marketing and monetization of their platforms, products, or services by enabling the placement of different types of advertisements on digital properties including mobile apps, websites, and connected TV devices (collectively, the “Advertising Services” or “Services”).  As explained below, consumers interact with us in a few ways, primarily through advertisements served by AppLovin on behalf of advertisers.
The AppLovin Privacy Policy (this “Privacy Policy”) explains how we collect, use, and share information through our Services and advertising platform, and our corporate website at www.applovin.com (the “Website”), as well as your choices related to that information.
Contents
Our Advertising Services
Our Website
Additional Provisions for EU/UK/Swiss Individuals
U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice
Policy Changes
Contact Us
Our Advertising Services
This section describes the information we collect, use, and share through our Advertising Services.
General Information Collection and Use
If you are a consumer who downloads and uses an application which contains the AppLovin SDK or otherwise interacts with the Services through advertisements served within a digital property, we may collect certain information, including the following:
Device, App, and Browser Data
Device make, model, and operating system;
Device properties related to screen size, orientation, audio, battery, device memory usage, settings, and boot time;
Device settings related to accessibility features, font size, and theme;
Carrier;
Name and properties of mobile application through which a consumer interacts with the Services;
Country, time zone, and locale settings (country and preferred language);
Network connection type and speed;
IP Address;
Internet browser user-agent used to access the Services;
HTTP header information;
Advertising IDs (IDFA/GAID/Amazon FOSAID);
Vendor IDs (IDFV);
App Set IDs; and
Advertising and tracking preferences and restrictions.
Application publishers may choose to share with us additional information including your age or year of birth, gender, email, phone number, and interest segments for purposes of their own direct ad serving.  We do not retain this data or pass it downstream to advertising partners.  Please see the applicable publisher’s privacy policy for more information about their use of first party data.
Advertisers (through the advertiser itself or through a third party service provider on behalf of such advertiser) may also share transactional or “event” data related to a consumer’s interaction with an application, such as information about the actions taken in an application like purchases or application installations.
Information Collection and Use Specific
to
e-Commerce Ads Only
If you are a consumer who interacts with the Services through an e-commerce platform or a merchant website, we may collect certain additional information (that you provided to the e-commerce platform or merchant, through a third party’s API, our SDK, pixel, or other similar technologies), including the following:
User IDs;
Shopping browsing behavior (e.g., views) and search history;
Records of products purchased or considered (e.g., added to cart, check out);
Purchasing histories; and
Information regarding user interactions with advertising partners and their merchant partners’ sites and advertisements.
How We Collect Your Information
This information may be collected automatically across mobile apps and devices or received from third-parties across different technologies over time. We may also combine information we collect with other information we derive through analytical techniques, and we will use that combined information to offer the Services.
How We Use Your Information
We generally use the information we collect to:
Deliver the Services, maintain, and improve them, including our AI-powered advertising technology, and research and develop new ones;
Promote safety, security, and integrity of Services;
Provide measurement, analytics, and reporting; and
Comply with legal and regulatory obligations.
We use AI-powered advertising technology (sometimes referred to as “automated decision-making”) to help us improve our advertising products and Services and serve ads that are relevant and interesting to you. We use it in ways that do not produce legal or similarly significant effects on you (for example, by reordering how advertisements might appear when you visit a digital property such as a mobile app or a website).
Information Sharing
We may share information we collect or derive with third parties in the following contexts:
Service Providers.
We transfer information to service providers, and other partners who support our business, such as providing technical infrastructure services, analyzing how our Services are used, measuring the effectiveness of ads and services, providing customer service, or facilitating payments. These partners must adhere to strict confidentiality obligations in a way that is consistent with this Privacy Policy and the agreements we enter into with them.
Affiliates.
We may share information within the AppLovin family of companies for purposes consistent with this Privacy Policy.
Advertising Partners.
We share information with our third-party advertising partners, including advertisers, ad networks, exchanges, demand side platforms, merchants, other advertising partners (who aggregate their own demand sources), and ad optimization and measurement/attribution partners (e.g., mobile measurement partners or “MMPs”) to provide our clients with Advertising Services. This information may be used by such third-party partners to measure how effective ads are, show advertisements to end users for products and services that are more likely to appeal to them (a practice known as interest-based advertising or behavioral advertising), and to undertake web analytics to analyze traffic and other ad activity to improve the advertising experience.
Unless otherwise noted in our partner list, each AppLovin advertising partner is an independent controller of your data. You can view a list of AppLovin advertising partners with whom we share your data
here
, current as of the date listed at the top of that page.
If you do not want to receive interest-based advertisements, please see the
“Manage Your Privacy Choices”
section below. If you are located in the European Union, UK, or Switzerland, you may also see the
“Additional Provisions for EU/UK/Swiss Individuals”
section below for more options. If you are an individual resident of the U.S. states that have enacted comprehensive consumer privacy laws, you may also review the “
U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice
” section below for more options.
Please note that the practices of our third-party advertising partners delivering advertisements through our Services are subject to those partners’ own privacy policies.
Regulatory or Legal Requirements.
We may disclose information to governmental regulatory authorities as required by law, including for tax or accounting purposes, in response to their requests for such information or to assist in investigations. We may also disclose personal information to third parties in connection with claims, disputes, or litigation, when otherwise required by law or court order.
Safety and Terms Enforcement.
We may disclose information if we determine, in our sole discretion, that its disclosure is necessary to protect the health, safety, or rights of you or any other person, protect against fraud, or enforce our legal rights, including contractual commitments made to us by third parties.
Business Transfers.
We may disclose personal information as part of an organizational business transaction, such as a merger, acquisition, joint venture, financing, or sale of organizational assets and may transfer personal information to a third party as one of the business assets in such a transaction. We may also disclose personal information in the event of insolvency, bankruptcy, or receivership.
Manage Your Privacy Choices:
To limit collection of information from mobile devices, please visit your device’s settings to set the “Limit Ad Track” or other similar features on your device. Additionally, you may opt-out of interest-based advertising within ads served by AppLovin. For detailed instructions, see
How AppLovin Shows You Ads
. You can also make choices about data collection for certain companies by visiting an industry consumer choice platform such as the NAI (
https://optout.networkadvertising.org/
) or DAA (
https://optout.aboutads.info/
).  You may still receive ads after limiting processing of information for interest-based advertising, but those ads may be less relevant to your interests.
To see or manage the data collected by AppLovin from your device, you may download the AppLovin Privacy Management Application from the Apple or Google Play Stores:
By navigating through the tabs in the AppLovin Privacy Management Application, you can erase the personal information that AppLovin may have collected about you or request a copy of that personal information.
Children’s Privacy
We do not knowingly collect personal information from, or serve advertisements to, children as defined and required by applicable laws. If you believe we have served an advertisement to a child or might have any personal information from or about a child, or if you believe a mobile application in which an AppLovin-served advertisement appeared may be designed for, directed to, or pass personal information knowingly from, children in violation of our policies, please contact us via email at
dataprotection@applovin.com
.
Data Security and Retention
We implement reasonable measures to help secure the information we collect through the Services. We retain the data we collect through the Services for up to 2 years. Information is automatically purged from our system if the Services do not receive any updated information for a device in the last 2 years. Note that we will retain information in our systems for as long as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements.
[END OF ADVERTISING SERVICES-SPECIFIC PROVISIONS]
Our Website
This section describes the information we collect, use, and share through our Website.
Cookies and Other Similar Technology
The Website uses cookies, web beacons, or other similar technology to collect information for various purposes, including interest-based advertising. This information may include your IP address, device identifier, browser type, device type, the date and time of your visit, and the areas of the Website you visit. To learn more about and manage the cookies on this Website, please click “Cookie Settings” in our Website footer. You may also be able to limit the use of cookies through your browser settings. Note that certain parts of the Website may not function properly without cookies. Additionally, you may still receive ads after limiting processing of information for interest-based advertising, but those ads may be less relevant to your interests. If you erase your cookies, reset your device identifier, or use different browsers or devices, you may need to make your choices again.
We partner with Google Analytics to learn more about how you use our Website. For more information about how Google Analytics works you can visit
here
. To opt-out of Google Analytics, you can visit
here
and follow the instructions.
Additional Information Collection for Business Account Owners
When you register with AppLovin to use our Services, you may provide us with personal information such as your name, email address, phone number, mailing address, user name, and password. You may also provide us with payment information when you submit or receive a payment, or other information when you complete the online forms available on the Website. We may also acquire information from other trusted sources to update or supplement the information that you voluntarily provide to us or that we collect automatically.
How We Use Your Information
We may use the information we collect or you provide to us through the Website for various purposes, including:
To communicate with you, for example through newsletters or with other information about our products and services;
To operate and improve the Website and our Services;
To customize the Website;
For analytics and research;
For marketing purposes; and
For purposes disclosed at the time of collection.
Information Sharing
We may share information we collect through the Website in the following contexts:
With your consent;
For advertising and marketing purposes;
In response to a subpoena, court order, or other legal process;
To protect our rights and the rights of others;
With our affiliates;
With service providers that help us operate the Website and Services;
As part of a sale, merger, or acquisition, including at bankruptcy; and
For purposes disclosed at the time of collection.
Links to Other Websites
The Website may provide links to other websites or other digital properties that we do not control. We encourage you to review the privacy policy of those digital properties that you may visit.
Updating Information
You can update the personal information you provide to us by correcting, updating, or deleting the information associated with you via your AppLovin account. To add, modify, remove, or request access to the personal information about you that we hold, please see the
“Contact Us”
section below.
Your Marketing Choices
If you no longer wish to receive marketing-related emails from us on a going-forward basis, you may opt out of receiving these emails by clicking “Unsubscribe” at the bottom of any marketing email you receive from us or by emailing us at
dataprotection@applovin.com
.
Children
Our Website is not intended for use by children as defined and required by applicable law. We do not knowingly collect personal information from children through the Website. If you believe we might have any personal information from or about a child, please contact us via email at
dataprotection@applovin.com
.
Data Security and Retention
We have implemented reasonable physical, technical, and administrative security measures for the Website to help protect information we collect and store.
For detailed information regarding retention associated with cookies on the applovin.com domain, please click “Cookie Settings” in our Website footer to learn more.
We retain other information such as customer contact and payment information in our systems for as long as necessary as permitted by law to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements.
[END OF WEBSITE-SPECIFIC PROVISIONS]
Additional Provisions for EU/UK/Swiss Individuals
If you are located in the European Union, United Kingdom, or Switzerland, the following additional provisions apply to you.
Data Privacy Framework
AppLovin complies with the EU-U.S Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.
AppLovin has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.  AppLovin has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
If you are an EU, UK, or Swiss individual, where we transfer your personal data to third party servicer providers (see above) who perform services for us or on our behalf, we are responsible for the processing of that data by them and shall remain liable if they process your personal data in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless we are not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
With respect to personal data received or transferred pursuant to the Data Privacy Framework, AppLovin is subject to the regulatory enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission. In certain situations, AppLovin may be required to disclose personal data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, AppLovin commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your personal information. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF should first contact AppLovin at
dataprotection@applovin.com
. AppLovin refers unresolved complaints to TRUSTe, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States.  If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
for more information or to file a complaint.  These dispute resolution services are provided at no cost to you.
For complaints regarding DPF compliance not resolved by any of the other DPF mechanisms, you have the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration. Further information can be found on the official DPF website.
Lawful Basis for Processing
On certain occasions, we process your personal data when it is necessary for the performance of a contract to which you are a party, such as to provide services to you. We may also process your personal data to respond to your inquiries concerning our products and services.
On other occasions, we process your personal data where required by law. We may also process your personal data if necessary to protect your interests or the interests of a third party.
Additionally, we process your personal data when necessary to do so for fraud prevention, improving our network and services, and marketing our services to advertisers and publishers, where these interests are not overridden by your data protection rights.
If the processing of your personal data is necessary, we will generally ensure that consent has been obtained from you if there is no other lawful basis for such processing. You have the right to withdraw your consent to processing of personal data at any time.
If personal data covered by this Privacy Policy is to be used for a new purpose that is materially different from that for which the personal data was originally collected or subsequently authorized, or is to be disclosed to a non-agent third party in a manner not specified in this Privacy Policy, we will provide you with an opportunity to choose whether to have your personal data so used or disclosed. Requests to opt out of such uses or disclosures of personal data should be sent to us as specified in the “Contact” section below. Certain personal data, such as information about medical or health conditions, racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, is considered “Sensitive Information”. AppLovin does not collect or seek to elicit “Sensitive Information”.
For questions about data processing, please contact our Data Protection Officer. Visit the “Contact” section below for contact information.
Your Rights
If you are an individual in the EU, UK, or Switzerland, you are able:
To request access to the personal data we hold about you;
To request that we rectify or erase your personal data;
To request that we restrict or block the processing of your personal data;
Under certain circumstances, to receive personal data about you that we store and transmit to another without hindrance from us, including requesting that we provide your personal data directly to another, i.e., a right to data portability; and
Where we previously obtained your consent, to withdraw consent to processing your personal data.
To exercise these rights, please contact us at the email address set forth in the
“Contact Us”
section below.  Our Data Protection Officer can also be reached at this email address.  Please be aware that we may be unable to afford these rights to you under certain circumstances, such as if we are legally prevented from doing so.
In certain circumstances, you may appoint an authorized agent to exercise any rights that you may have on your behalf.  If you choose to exercise any rights through an authorized agent, you will need to verify your identity directly with us before we can process any requests.  In addition, we will need written documentation demonstrating the authorized agent’s authority to act on your behalf.
Additionally, you have the right to lodge a complaint against us. To do so, contact the supervisory authority in your country of residence.
EU and UK Privacy Representatives
We have appointed
Prighter Group
as our privacy representatives in the EU and UK.  You can contact us through our privacy representatives at the following addresses:
For residents of the EU
:
PrighterGDPR-Rep by Maetzler Rechtsanwalts GmbH & Co KG
c/o AppLovin Corporation
Kriegerstraße 44
30161 Hannover
Germany
For residents of the UK
:
PrighterUK-Rep by Prighter Ltd.
c/o AppLovin Corporation
20 Mortlake Mortlake High Street
London, SW14 8JN
United Kingdom
Additional information regarding our privacy representatives can be found at the following link:
https://prighter.com/q/19826057144
.
[END OF EU/UK/SWISS SPECIFIC PROVISIONS]
U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice
Additional provisions for individual residents of the U.S. states that have enacted comprehensive consumer privacy laws are included in our
U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice
, which explains how those residents may exercise their privacy rights.
Policy Changes
We may, in our sole discretion, make changes to this Privacy Policy from time to time in order to accommodate new technologies, industry practices, regulatory requirements, or for other purposes. If we make any changes, we will update the “Effective Date” posted at the top of this Privacy Policy. If we make any material changes, we may notify you by email (sent to the email address specified in your account) or by means of a notice on the Website prior to the change becoming effective. We encourage you to review this Privacy Policy periodically to ensure that you understand how we collect, use, and share information.
Any changes to this Privacy Policy will become effective when the revised Privacy Policy is posted on the Website. By continuing to use the Website or Advertising Services following such changes, you are agreeing to accept the terms of the revised Privacy Policy.
Contact Us
If you have any questions or comments about this Privacy Policy, please write to us at:
Data Protection Officer
AppLovin Corporation
1100 Page Mill Road
Palo Alto, CA 94304
You can also contact us or our Data Protection Officer via email at
dataprotection@applovin.com
.
Please be sure to include your relevant account information in any correspondence to us.  This will help ensure that we can respond to your inquiry in a timely manner.
If you have a customer care issue, please visit
AppLovin Support
.
Sub-policy 2
https://unity3d.com/legal/privacy-policy:
Legal Information
Privacy Policy Hub
Privacy Policy Hub
Developer Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy governs our information practices for our Developer Services, which includes any websites, where a link to this Policy is provided. Developer Services means products and services intended for a party that develops and/or distributes a game or other app made with and/or using Unity Services.
This Privacy Policy also applies to Personal Information we collect offline, such as when you call us or interact with Unity in person, such as at an industry event or at a place of business.
Developer Privacy Policy FAQ
These FAQs provide a handy entry point to our longer and more comprehensive
Developer Privacy Policy
. They are intended to enhance rather than replace the important notices in the Privacy Policy, which governs our collection, use, storage, and sharing of the information that we collect or receive from you.
Customers should understand that Unity does not provide legal advice, therefore the information on this page is not a substitute for seeking your own legal counsel to determine the legal requirements of your business and processes, and how to address them.
Game Player and App User Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy will provide you with information on how Unity Technologies will collect, use, store, share or otherwise handle your Personal Information that we are responsible for and collect or receive through your use of applications which are owned by third parties but utilize Unity’s technology.
This Privacy Policy also applies to Personal Information we collect offline, such as when you call us or interact with Unity in person, such as at an industry event or at a place of business.
Game Player and App User Privacy FAQ
These FAQs provide a handy entry point to our longer and more comprehensive
Game Player and App User Privacy Policy
.They are intended to enhance rather than replace the important notices in the Privacy Policy, which governs our collection, use, storage, and sharing of the information that we collect or receive from you.
Unity Educational Products for Schools Privacy Notice
This sets forth Unity’s policies and procedures regarding the Unity software products in schools.
Privacy Supplement Statement for Unity MARS Companion App
This sets forth special privacy terms regarding use of the Unity MARS Companion App.
Unity Data Processing Addendum (“DPA”)
This Data Processing Addendum (this “DPA”) is incorporated into and forms an integral part of the Unity Terms of Service. This agreement determines the rights and obligations of each party when processing personal information.
DPA Amendment for EU, UK, and Swiss SCCs
In 2021, the European Commission and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commission issued new Standard Contractual Clauses ("2021 SCCs"). Additionally, in 2022, the UK Parliament approved the UK International Data Transfer Addendum to the EU SCCs (“UK Addendum”). The 2021 SCCs and UK Addendum replace the Standard Contractual Clauses enacted in 2010 (“2010 SCCs”). This is a pre-signed copy of this document which you may download, execute on your side, and return to DPA@unity3d.com.
Technical and Organisational Measures including Technical and Organisational Measure to ensure the Security of the Data
Technical and Organisational Measures (TOMs) are strategic safeguards designed to protect data security and ensure adherence to data protection regulations. These are incorporated by reference in Unity’s
Data Protection Addendum.
Sub-Processors
Sub-processors are third-party companies that assist Unity by handling personal data on Unity's behalf. These are incorporated by reference in Unity’s
Data Protection Addendum
.
GENERATIVE AI SUPPLEMENTAL PRIVACY NOTICE
This notice explains Unity's processing activities with respect to Personal Information collected through users of Generative AI Tools
Sub-policy 3
https://support.google.com/admob/answer/6128543?hl=en:
Skip to main content
AdMob & AdSense program policies
AdMob policies and restrictions
Next: AdSense Program policies
Publishers who wish to participate in AdMob must comply with our online
AdSense Program policies
.
All publishers are required to adhere to the following policies, so please read them carefully. If you fail to comply with these policies without permission from Google, we reserve the right to disable ad serving to your app and/or disable your AdMob account at any time. If your account is disabled, you will not be eligible for further participation in the AdSense and/or AdMob program(s).
Content policies and restrictions
Behavioral policies
Google Publisher Policies
Google Publisher Restrictions
User-generated content
Exceptions to AdSense policies
Invalid clicks and impressions
Ad placement
Sub-syndication and ad network mediation
App promotion
Personalized advertising
Apps that offer compensation programs
Policies for ads that offer rewards
Invalid activity
Implementation guidance
Invalid activity
How Google prevents invalid activity
How you can prevent invalid activity
Estimated vs. finalized earnings
Implementation guidance
Banner ad guidance
Interstitial ad guidance
AdMob native ads advanced policy compliance guidelines
Give feedback about this article
Choose a section to give feedback on
Next: AdSense Program policies
Was this helpful?
How can we improve it?
Yes
No
Submit
Post to the help community
Get answers from community members
Contact us
Tell us more and we’ll help you get there
true
AdMob & AdSense program policies
1 of 12
AdMob policies and restrictions
2 of 12
AdSense Program policies
3 of 12
App and account appeals
1 of 5
Google Play policy restriction: Disabled app
2 of 5
AdMob policy violation: Disabled app(s) or account
3 of 5
Invalid activity: Disabled account
4 of 5
Invalid activity: Suspended account
5 of 5
Account issues FAQ
4 of 12
Behavioral policies
5 of 12
Implementation guidance
1 of 8
Implementation guidance
2 of 8
Banner ad guidance
3 of 8
Discouraged banner implementations
4 of 8
Recommended banner implementations
5 of 8
Banner ad guidance: 300x250
6 of 8
Interstitial ad guidance
7 of 8
Disallowed interstitial implementations
8 of 8
Recommended interstitial implementations
6 of 12
Ad format specific policies
1 of 1
Policies for ad units that offer rewards
7 of 12
Families
1 of 3
Tag an ad request from an app for child-directed treatment
2 of 3
Comply with Google Play’s Families Policy using AdMob
3 of 3
Ad-serving Protections for Teens
8 of 12
Invalid activity
1 of 7
Invalid traffic
2 of 7
How Google prevents invalid activity
3 of 7
How you can prevent invalid activity
4 of 7
Estimated vs finalized earnings
5 of 7
What is sabotage and how to prevent it
6 of 7
Can I see a record of invalid activity deductions from my earnings?
7 of 7
Common questions about invalid traffic
9 of 12
Deductions from earnings FAQ
10 of 12
Privacy and security
1 of 2
User-generated content
2 of 2
Send non-personalized ad requests to third-party RTB buyers
11 of 12
Advertiser guidelines and policies
12 of 12
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (LGPD)
1 of 3
Helping users comply with the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (LGPD)
2 of 3
Personalized and non-personalized ads for LGPD
3 of 3
Ad Technology Providers for the LGPD
Show your support to promote DEI in Gaming by turning intentions into action!
Check out the newly launched Diversity in Gaming website, where you can find video stories and written pledges from global gaming developers. This campaign centers on 3 pillars: diverse teams, diverse games and diverse audiences showing how diversity is not just good for gamers, but for business as well. Show your support by taking the pledge to promote DEI in Gaming and share it on social!
Learn More
Search
Clear search
Close search
Main menu
Google apps
10346136812054888318
true
Search Help Center
true
true
true
Google Help
Help Center
Community
Google AdMob
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Submit feedback
true
true
73175
false
false
Inaccurate - doesn't match what I see in the product
Hard to understand - unclear or translation is wrong
Missing info - relevant but not comprehensive
Irrelevant - doesn’t match the title and / or my expectations
Minor errors - formatting issues, typos, and / or broken links
Other suggestions - ideas to improve the content
Share additional info or suggestions
​
​
Do not share any personal info
Cancel
Submit
By continuing, you agree Google uses your answers,
account & system info
to improve services, per our
Privacy
&
Terms
.
false
Sub-policy 4
https://developers.facebook.com/policy/:
Build with us
Business Messaging
WhatsApp Business Platform
Messenger Business Platform
Ads and Monetization
App Ads
Marketing API
Conversions API
Social Integrations
Sharing to Reels & Stories
Threads API
Building Blocks
Facebook SDK
App Events
View all
Docs
Blog
Resources
Developer support
Developer tools
Videos
Success stories
Developer centers
AI
Build with Meta Horizon OS
Clear
See all results for
Suggested links
App Ads
Get more people to install and engage with your app.
App Review
Build on the WhatsApp Business Platform.
Responsible platform initiatives
Discover the Responsible platform initiatives and improvements.
Login
English (US)
Bahasa Indonesia
Deutsch
Español
Español (España)
Français (France)
Italiano
Português (Brasil)
Tiếng Việt
Русский
العربية
ภาษาไทย
한국어
中文(香港)
中文(台灣)
中文(简体)
日本語
English (US)
Platform Terms
1. Introduction
2. Intellectual Property Rights
3. Data Use
4. Privacy Policy
5. Service Providers and Tech Providers
6. Data Security
7. Compliance Review Rights and Suspension and Termination of these Terms
8. Notice
9. Indemnification
10. International Transfers
11. General
12. Glossary
Last updated February 3, 2025
Meta Platform Terms
1. Introduction
a. The Meta for Developers Platform (“Platform”) is the set of APIs, SDKs, tools, plugins, code, technology, content, and services that enables others, including app developers and website operators, to develop functionality, retrieve data from Meta and any other
Meta Products
, or provide data to us.
b. To use Platform (including to Process any Platform Data), you agree to these Platform Terms (“Terms”), as well as all other applicable terms and policies. This may include the
Meta Terms of Service
, the
Instagram Terms of Use
, the
Meta Commercial Terms
, the
Business Tools Terms
, and any
Meta Product
terms that are applicable.
c. You must also comply with the applicable requirements in our
Developer Policies
and those made available on our
Developer Site
, including in our
Documentation
(collectively, the “Developer Docs”) and all applicable laws and regulations, including with respect to your collection, use, or other processing of Platform Data.
d. These Terms will start when you accept them or otherwise start accessing or using Platform, whichever date is earlier. If you are accepting these Terms or accessing or using Platform on behalf of an entity, you represent and warrant that you have the authority to bind such entity to these Terms and you agree on behalf of such entity to be bound by these Terms (and for clarity, all other references to “you” in these Terms refer to such entity).
e. If you fail to comply with these Terms or any other applicable terms or policies, we may suspend or terminate your App or account, as described below.
f. Capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein (including in Section 12 (“Glossary”) have the meaning given in our other terms and policies, including our
Terms of Service
and our
Meta Commercial Terms
.  The term “including” means “including without limitation.”
2. Intellectual Property Rights
a.  Our License to You.
Subject to your compliance with these Terms and all other applicable terms and policies, we grant you a limited, non-exclusive, non-sublicensable (except to Service Providers as described below), non-transferable, non-assignable license to use, access, and integrate with Platform, but only to the extent permitted in these Terms and all other applicable terms and policies. You will not sell, transfer, or sublicense Platform to anyone. Except as expressly licensed herein, you will not use, access, integrate with, modify, translate, create derivative works of, reverse engineer, or otherwise exploit Platform or any aspect thereof. The
Meta Companies
reserve all rights, title, and interest (including the right to enforce any such rights) not expressly granted in these Terms.
b. Your License to Us
i.
Your Content:
1. You grant us a non-exclusive, transferable, sublicensable, royalty-free, worldwide license to: host, use, distribute, modify, run, copy, publicly perform or display, translate, and create derivative works of any information, data, and other content made available by you or on your behalf (including by your Service Providers or through your App) in connection with Platform (collectively, “Your Content”) for any business purpose in connection with operating, providing, or improving Platform or any other
Meta Product
.  This license remains in effect even if you stop using Platform. Without limitation, your license to us includes: the right to incorporate Your Content into other parts of
Meta Products
, the right to attribute the source of Your Content using your name, trademarks, or logos; the right to use Your Content for promotional purposes, and the right to analyze Your Content (including to make sure you’re complying with these Terms and all other applicable terms and policies).
2. If you use the Meta Business Tools to send us Business Tool Data, our use of that data is governed by the Business Tools Terms rather than the foregoing license for Your Content.
3. If you owned Your Content before providing it to us, you will continue owning it after providing it to us, subject to any rights granted in these Terms or any other applicable terms or policies and any access you provide to others by sharing it via Platform.
ii.
Your App:
1. You grant us a non-exclusive, transferable, sublicensable, royalty-free, worldwide license to: host, use, distribute, modify, run, copy, publicly perform or display, translate, and create derivative works of your App for any business purpose in connection with operating, providing, or improving Platform.  This license remains in effect even if you stop using Platform. Without limitation, the foregoing license includes the right to frame or link to your App, to place content (including ads) around your App, and to analyze your App (including to assess your compliance with these Terms and all other applicable terms and policies).
2. As between the parties, in connection with Platform, we won’t be subject to any terms or policies associated with your App or Your Content (even if we click or tap agreement).  Those terms and policies are considered null and void and are rejected and excluded from these Terms.
3. Nothing in these Terms will be interpreted as a representation or agreement that we will not develop or have not developed apps, products, features, or services that are similar to your App or compete with your App.
iii.
Your Name, Trademarks, and Logos:
You grant us a non-exclusive, transferable, sublicensable, royalty-free, worldwide license to use your name, trademarks, and logos for distribution, marketing, and promotional purposes, in connection with your use of
Meta Products
, in all formats and media.  This license remains in effect for existing materials and instances even if you stop using Platform.
c. Protecting the Rights of Others
i. You will not provide or promote content in your App that infringes upon or otherwise violates the rights of any person or third party.
ii. You will obtain (and represent and warrant that you own or have secured) all rights necessary from all applicable rights holders to (1) grant the licenses, rights, and permissions in these Terms (including those in Section 2.b (“Your License to Us”)); (2) display, distribute, and deliver all information, data, and other content in your App; and (3) otherwise operate your App. This includes satisfying all licensing, reporting, and payout obligations to third parties.
iii. If your App contains content submitted or provided by your Users or other third parties, you must have an appropriate notice and takedown process and otherwise comply with all applicable laws and regulations to respond to notices of claimed infringement.  Without limiting that compliance, in the United States, you must comply with all requirements of the Digital Millennium Copyright Act.
3. Data Use
a. Prohibited Practices.
You will not perform, or facilitate or support others in performing, any of the following prohibited practices (collectively, “Prohibited Practices”):
i. Processing Platform Data to discriminate or encourage discrimination in a manner that disadvantages people based on personal attributes including race, ethnicity, color, national origin, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, family status, disability, medical or genetic condition, or any other categories prohibited by applicable law, regulation, or Meta policy. Using Platform Data such as gender or age to improve the applicable User’s experience in the App is permitted under this Section 3.a.i so long as it is compliant with applicable law or regulation.
ii. Processing Platform Data to make eligibility determinations about people, including for housing, employment, insurance, education opportunities, credit, government benefits, or immigration status.  By eligibility determinations, we mean determining whether to provide, deny, or take away a particular benefit (for example, housing or scholarships) as well as determining the terms under which the benefit will be provided, denied, or taken away.
iii. Processing Platform Data to perform, facilitate, or provide tools for surveillance.  Surveillance includes the Processing of Platform Data about people, places, groups, or events for law enforcement or national security purposes.
iv. Selling, licensing, or purchasing Platform Data.
v. Processing Platform Data without valid User consent in order to build or augment user profiles for any purpose.
vi. Attempting to decode, circumvent, re-identify, de-anonymize, unscramble, unencrypt, or reverse hash, or reverse-engineer Platform Data that is provided to you.
vii. Changing your App’s core functionality or data Processing so that Users would view it as an unfamiliar or different App, or materially changing the scope of Processing of previously collected Platform Data, unless in each case you first re-submit your App and receive our approval through App Review.
viii. Processing Platform Data for purposes other than the applicable permitted purposes set forth in Meta’s Developer Docs.
b. Additional Terms for Restricted Platform Data
i. You will not request Restricted Platform Data unless it is necessary to meaningfully improve the quality of the applicable User's experience in the specific product or service for which the User shared the data.
ii. It must be clear to the User why you are requesting their Restricted Platform Data in order to improve the quality of their experience.
iii. For clarity, your Processing of Restricted Platform Data must comply with the applicable Developer Docs and other provisions of these Terms (including the Prohibited Practices).
c. Sharing Platform Data.
You may only share Platform Data in compliance with these Terms (including Sections 3.a (“Prohibited Practices”), 3.b (“Additional Terms for Restricted Platform Data”), 4 (“Privacy Policy”), and 5 (“Service Providers and Tech Providers”)), applicable law and regulations, and all other applicable terms and policies, and only in the following circumstances:
i. With respect to Platform Data collected as a Tech Provider, solely as described below in Section 5.b (“Tech Providers”);
ii. With respect to Platform Data not collected as a Tech Provider,
1. when required under applicable law or regulation (you must retain proof of the applicable legal or regulatory requirement or request and provide it to us if we ask for it);
2. with your Service Provider in order for them to provide the services you requested;
3. when a User expressly directs you to share or expressly consents to your sharing the data with the third party for the purposes as specified in the User’s direction or consent (you must retain proof of the User’s express direction or consent and provide it to us if we ask for it); or
4. solely with respect to Platform Data that is not Restricted Platform Data, with other third parties, so long as:
a. you first contractually prohibit them from using the Platform Data in a way that would violate these Terms or any other applicable terms or policies (you must retain proof of the contractual prohibition and provide it to us if we ask for it); and
b. you ensure that any such third parties comply with these Terms and all other applicable terms and policies as if they were in your place, and you are responsible for their acts and omissions, including their noncompliance.
d. Retention, Deletion, and Accessibility of Platform Data
i. Unless required to keep Platform Data under applicable law or regulation, you must (and must make reasonable efforts to ensure your Service Providers) do the following:
1. Update or delete Platform Data promptly after receiving a request from us or the User to do so and give Users an easily accessible and clearly marked way to ask for their Platform Data to be modified or deleted.
2. Delete all Platform Data as soon as reasonably possible in the following cases:
a. When retaining the Platform Data is no longer necessary for a legitimate business purpose that is consistent with these Terms and all other applicable terms and policies;
b. When you stop operating the product or service through which the Platform Data was acquired;
c. When we request you delete the Platform Data for the protection of Users (which we will determine at our sole discretion);
d. When a User requests their Platform Data be deleted or no longer has an account with you (unless the Platform Data has been aggregated, obscured, or de-identified so that it cannot be associated with a particular User, browser, or device), or for Tech Providers, when a User or the Client requests their Platform Data be deleted or the Client no longer has an account with you;
e. When required by applicable law or regulations; or
f. As required under Section 7 (“Compliance Review Rights and Suspension and Termination of these Terms”).
ii. If you are required to keep Platform Data under applicable law or regulation, you must retain proof of the applicable legal or regulatory requirement or request and provide it if we ask for it.
iii. If you have received Platform Data in error, you must immediately report this to us
using this form
, delete that Platform Data, and provide proof of deletion if we ask for it.
e.
Exceptions to Restrictions.
The above provisions of  Sections 3.a-d do not apply to certain Platform Data as described
here
.
4. Privacy Policy
a. You will provide, maintain, and comply with a privacy policy that is available through an active, publicly available, easily accessible (including by our crawlers), and non-geoblocked URL. This URL must also be disclosed in the privacy policy field in the settings of your App Dashboard.
b. Your privacy policy must clearly explain what data you are Processing, how you are Processing it, the purposes for which you are Processing it, and how Users may request deletion of that data.
c. You may only Process Platform Data as clearly described in your privacy policy and in accordance with all applicable law and regulations, these Terms, and all other applicable terms and policies.
d. Your privacy policy will not supersede, modify, or be inconsistent with these Terms or any other terms or policies applicable to Platform Data.
5. Service Providers and Tech Providers
a. Service Providers
i. You will not use a Service Provider in connection with your use of Platform or Processing of Platform Data unless such Service Provider first agrees in writing to do the following:
1. Use Platform and Process Platform Data solely for you and at your direction in order to provide services you requested in a manner that is consistent with these Terms, all other applicable terms and policies, and your privacy policy, and for no other individual or entity and for no other purpose, including for the Service Provider’s own purposes; and
2. In the event the Service Provider engages another Service Provider (“Sub-Service Provider”) in order to provide the services requested, ensure the Service Provider requires the Sub-Service Provider in writing to comply with the above requirements.
ii. You must ensure that any Service Provider and Sub-Service Provider complies with these Terms and all other applicable terms and policies as if they were in your place, and you are responsible for their acts and omissions, including their noncompliance.
iii. When you cease using a Service Provider or Sub-Service Provider, you must ensure they immediately cease using Platform and Processing Platform Data and promptly delete all Platform Data in their possession or control.
iv. Upon our request, you must provide a list of your Service Providers and Sub-Service Providers including up-to-date contact information for each, the types and volume of Platform Data shared, and proof of written agreements with your Service Providers to demonstrate compliance with this section.
v. We may prohibit your use of any Service Provider or Sub-Service Provider in connection with your use of Platform or Processing of Platform Data if we believe that (1) they have violated these Terms or other applicable terms or policies or (2) they are negatively impacting Platform, other
Meta Products
, Platform Data, or people who use
Meta Products
, and will provide notice to you if we do.  Promptly upon such notice, you must stop using that Service Provider or Sub-Service Provider in connection with your use of Platform or Processing of Platform Data.
vi. We may require that your Service Providers or Sub-Service Providers agree to these Terms or other applicable terms or policies in order to access
Meta Products
, Platform, or Platform Data.
b. Tech Providers
i. If you are a Tech Provider, you must comply with the other provisions of these Terms, as well as the provisions in this section with respect to your use of Platform and Processing of Platform Data as a Tech Provider.  If the terms conflict, the terms that are more restrictive on you or more protective of us apply.
ii. You, as a Tech Provider, understand and agree to the following:
1. You will only use Platform and Process Platform Data on behalf of and at the direction of your Client on whose behalf you access it to help such Client to use Platform or Process Platform Data in accordance with these Terms and all other applicable terms and policies (“Client’s Purpose”), and not for your own purposes or another Client’s or entity’s purposes;
2. You will ensure that Platform Data you maintain on behalf of one Client is maintained separately from that of other Clients;
3. You will maintain an up-to-date list of your Clients and their contact information and provide it to us if we ask for it;
4. You will only share Platform Data in compliance with these Terms, applicable law and regulations, and all other applicable terms and policies, and only in the following circumstances:
a. with your applicable Client, so long as you first contractually prohibit such Client from Processing Platform Data in a way that would violate these Terms or any other applicable terms or policies;
b. to the extent required under applicable law or regulation (you must retain proof of the applicable legal or regulatory requirement or request and provide it to us if we ask for it);
c. with your Service Provider solely to the extent necessary for your applicable Client’s Purpose; or
d. with your Client’s service provider solely to the extent necessary for such Client’s Purpose and when such Client expressly directs you to share the data with such service provider (you must retain proof of the Client’s express direction and provide it to us if we ask for it);
5. We may require that your Clients agree to these Terms or other applicable terms or policies in order to access
Meta Products
, Platform, or Platform Data through your App.
6. You will promptly terminate a Client’s use of our
Meta Products
, Platform, or Platform Data through your App if we request it because we believe that the Client (a) has acted in a way that would violate these Terms or other applicable terms or policies or (b) is negatively impacting Platform, other
Meta Products
, Platform Data, or people who use
Meta Products
.
7. You will promptly notify a Client of any communication sent to you by Meta concerning a User's request regarding the Processing of their Platform Data, including requests to exercise their data subject rights with respect to their Platform Data.
6. Data Security
a. Data Security Requirements
i. You must always have in effect and maintain administrative, physical, and technical safeguards that do the following:
1. Meet or exceed industry standards given the sensitivity of the Platform Data;
and
2. Are designed to prevent any unauthorized (including in violation of these Terms or any other applicable terms or policies) Processing (including, for the avoidance of doubt, access, destruction, loss, alteration, disclosure, distribution, or compromise) of Platform Data.
ii. You must have an easily accessible way for people to report security vulnerabilities in your App to you, and you must promptly address identified deficiencies.
iii. You may use
Meta Products
to authenticate users, but you must not separately request or collect a Meta user’s login credentials for any
Meta Products
.
iv. You must protect and not transfer, share, or solicit Meta user IDs, access tokens, or app secrets, but you may share with a Service Provider who helps you build, run, or operate your App.
b. Incident Reporting
i. If any of the following incidents happen, you must notify us using
this form
as soon as practicable and provide us with information we request regarding:
1. Any unauthorized (including in violation of these Terms or any other applicable terms or policies) Processing (including, for the avoidance of doubt, access, destruction, loss, alteration, disclosure, distribution or compromise) of Platform Data; or
2. Any incidents that are reasonably likely to compromise the security, confidentiality, or integrity of your IT Systems or your Service Provider’s or Sub-Service Provider’s IT Systems.
ii. You must immediately begin remediation of the incident and reasonably cooperate with us, including by informing us in reasonable detail of the impact of the incident upon Platform Data and corrective actions being taken, and keeping us updated about your compliance with any notification or other requirements under applicable laws and regulations.
7. Compliance Review Rights and Suspension and Termination of these Terms
a. App Review.
We may require that you submit your App for our review or approval (“App Review”). Whether or not your App (including its access to any Platform Data) is approved (which will be in our sole discretion), you will ensure that your App is compliant with these Terms and all other applicable terms and policies, and we may review your App for such compliance from time to time, in our sole discretion. You will cooperate with our reviews and provide any information we request, including access to your App. We may verify information you provide to us during any such reviews or otherwise in your App Dashboard, which you will update to keep it complete and accurate.
b. Regular Monitoring.
We, or third-party professionals working at our direction (including auditors, attorneys, consultants, and/or computer forensics analysts) (collectively, “Third-Party Auditors”), may conduct regular monitoring of your App and its access to Platform and Processing of Platform Data using technical and operational measures.
c. Auditing Rights
i. We or Third-Party Auditors may conduct an Audit, no more than once a calendar year unless there is a Necessary Condition, to ensure that your and your App’s Processing of Platform Data is and has been in compliance with these Terms and all other applicable terms and policies.
ii. Audits will be conducted during normal business hours after providing you with at least 10 business days’ written notice (email will suffice), unless we determine in our sole discretion a Necessary Condition requires more immediate access.
iii. You will cooperate with the Audits, including by (1) providing all necessary physical and remote access to your IT Systems and Records, and (2) providing information and assistance as reasonably requested (including making your personnel who are knowledgeable about your or your App’s Processing of Platform Data available for our questioning).
iv. You will also use commercially reasonable efforts to get permission and cooperation from your Service Providers for us to conduct such Audits with respect to their IT Systems, Records, and applicable personnel.
v. You will remedy any non-compliance revealed by an Audit as soon as reasonably practicable (as we determine based on the facts and circumstances), after which we may conduct follow-up Audits to ensure proper remediation of the non-compliance.
vi. If an Audit reveals any non-compliance by you or your Service Provider(s) then you will reimburse us for all of our reasonable costs and expenses associated with conducting the Audit and any related follow-up Audits.
vii. After these Terms have ended, our Audit rights under this section will survive until 1 year after the later of (i) when you affirmatively demonstrate that you have stopped Processing all Platform Data or (ii) when you affirmatively demonstrate that all embodiments thereof that are in your and your Service Providers’ possession or control have been deleted. For the avoidance of doubt, nothing in this section limits any other rights or remedies we may have by law, in equity, or under these Terms or other applicable terms or policies.
d. Certifications.
From time to time, we may request (in writing or through your App Dashboard, Platform, or any
Meta Product
) information, certifications, and attestations relating to your use of Platform or Processing of Platform Data, which you will provide to us in the requested time frame and form. This may include certifying: (i) your compliance with these Terms and all other applicable terms and policies, and (ii) the purpose or use for the Platform Data you have requested or have access to, and that each such purpose or use complies with these Terms and all other applicable terms and policies. All such certifications and attestations must be provided by an authorized representative of yours.
e. Suspension and Termination
i. We may take enforcement action against you and your App if we believe, in our sole discretion, that:
1. You have not timely responded to our requests related to monitoring or auditing;
2. You or your App has violated or may have violated these Terms or any other applicable terms or policies or is negatively impacting Platform, other
Meta Products
, Platform Data, or people who use
Meta Products
;
3. You have created or maintained App(s) to circumvent, or attempt to circumvent, our enforcement actions (an attempt to circumvent could include creating or maintaining App(s) to bypass any restrictions or enforcement we’ve placed on your other App(s) or account due to a violation of our terms and policies);
4. It is needed to comply with applicable laws or regulations or otherwise required or requested by a court order or governmental authority; or
5. It is needed to protect the
Meta Companies
from legal or regulatory liability.
ii. We may take enforcement action at any time, including while we investigate your App(s), with or without notice to you. Enforcement can be both automated and manual.  It can include suspending or permanently removing your App(s) and account, removing your access and your App’s access to Platform, requiring that you stop Processing and delete Platform Data, terminating our agreements with you, or any other action that we consider to be appropriate, including terminating other agreements with you or your ability to use
Meta Products
.
iii. We may suspend or end your App’s access to any Platform APIs, permissions, or features that your App has not used or accessed within a 28-day period with or without notice to you.
8. Notice
After you agree to these Terms, any written notice, request, or communications from us to you may be provided via email or mail (for example, to the email address or mailing address in your App account with us) or via notifications within the
Meta Products
(for example, in your account with us).  You will keep your contact information current, including name, business name, and email.
9. Indemnification
In addition to and without limiting the scope of the “Indemnification” Section in our
Meta Commercial Terms
if anyone brings a claim, cause of action, or dispute against the
Meta Companies
related to your use of Platform, your Processing of Platform Data, Your Content, or your App, name or logo, products or services, or actions in connection with Platform, you will indemnify and hold the
Meta Companies
harmless from and against all damages, losses, and expenses of any kind (including reasonable legal fees and costs) related to any such claim, cause of action, or dispute.
10. International Transfers — EEA Data Transfers
This section shall apply to the extent that your Processing of Platform Data includes personal data controlled by Meta Platforms Ireland Limited (“Meta Ireland Data”) and the transfer of such Meta Ireland Data to a territory outside of the European Economic Area that, at the time of such transfer, does not have a positive adequacy decision from the European Commission under Article 45 of Regulation (EU) 2016/679 (each an “EEA Data Transfer”).
Whenever there is an EEA Data Transfer, your use of Meta Ireland Data is subject to your compliance with the Clauses in so far as they relate to controller to controller transfers (Module One). In each case, you agree that for the purposes of Section IV, Clauses 17 and 18 in the Clauses, Option 1 and Option (b) shall apply respectively and the Member State shall be Ireland. Nothing in this Section 10 (International transfers — EEA Data Transfers) is intended to vary or modify the Clauses. For the purposes of the Appendix to the Clauses, the following will apply:
Your Rights, Ownership, and Obligations
a. For the purposes of Annex I(A) to the Clauses, Meta Platforms Ireland Limited is the "data exporter" and you are the "data importer" as defined in the Clauses.
b. For the purposes of Annex I(B) to the Clauses:
i. “Categories of data subjects” are the Users who visit, access, use, or otherwise interact with the App and the products and services of Meta Platforms Ireland Limited;
ii. "Categories of personal data" are Meta Ireland Data, which includes profile information, photos and videos, location information, communications between Users, information about use of the App and other products and services, payment information, device information, information about visits to third-party websites or Apps that use a "like" or "comment" button or other service integration, information from third-party partners or the Meta Companies, or as otherwise set forth in the Data Policy;
iii. "Sensitive data" is personal data about a person's racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, trade-union membership, genetic data, biometric data for the purpose of uniquely identifying a natural person, data concerning health or data concerning a natural person's sex life or sexual orientation, criminal convictions or alleged commission of an offence;
iv. "Frequency of the transfer" is on a continuous basis to the extent required to fulfill the purpose outlined in Section 10.b.v below;
v. "Nature and purpose of the data transfer(s)" is the provision of the App and other products and services by you to Users pursuant to the applicable terms and conditions and Privacy Policy of you and/or your Client; and
vi. "Period for which personal data will be retained" is as set out in Section 3.d.i.2 unless applicable laws require the Meta Ireland Data be retained for a longer period, in which case you shall only retain such Meta Ireland Data for the period required by such applicable laws and subject always to Section 10.d.
c. For the purposes of Annex I(C) to the Clauses, the competent supervisory authority will be the Data Protection Commission in Ireland; and
d. For the purposes of Annex II to the Clauses, you will implement and maintain
Meta's Technical and Organisational Measures
.
10A. International Transfers — UK Data Transfers
This Section 10A shall apply to the extent that your Processing of Platform Data includes personal data controlled by Meta Platforms, Inc. that is subject to the UK GDPR (as defined in the UK's Data Protection Act 2018 ("DPA")) (“UK Data”) and the transfer of such UK Data to a territory outside of the United Kingdom that, at the time of such transfer, does not have a positive adequacy decision from the Secretary of State in accordance with the relevant provisions of the UK GDPR and the DPA (“UK Data Transfer”).
Whenever there is a UK Data Transfer, your use of UK Data is subject to your compliance with the Approved Addendum (which is hereby incorporated by reference into these Terms and is deemed to have been entered into and completed as set out below). Nothing in this Section 10A (International transfers – UK Data Transfers) is intended to vary or modify the Approved Addendum. All defined terms used below shall have the meanings given to them in the Approved Addendum. For the purpose of the Approved Addendum, the following will apply:
a. In Table 1 of the Approved Addendum, the parties' details are as follows:
i. Meta Platforms, Inc. is the "data exporter" and you are the "data importer" as defined in the Approved Addendum.
ii. The parties details and key contact information are:
Meta Platforms, Inc., 1 Meta Way, Menlo Park, CA 94205, USA, and the contact person's details are as notified by the data exporter to the data importer from time to time.
Developer's details and key contact information are your details notified to Meta Platforms, Inc. from time to time.
iii. The parties agree that execution of these Terms by the parties shall constitute execution of the Approved Addendum.
b. For the purposes of Table 2 of the Approved Addendum, the selected modules of the Approved EU SCCs shall be Module 1 (controller to controller).
c. Table 3 of the Approved Addendum shall be populated as follows:
i. Annex 1A: List of Parties: See Table 1 references above and the activities relevant to the data transferred are as described in these Terms.
ii. Annex 1B: Description of Transfer: The information in Section 10.b shall apply, albeit references to "Meta Platforms Ireland Limited" shall be replaced with "Meta Platforms, Inc." and references to "Meta Ireland Data" shall be replaced with "UK Data".
iii. Annex II: Technical and organizational measures: For the purposes of Annex II, you will implement and maintain
Meta's Technical and Organisational Measures
.
d. In Table 4 of the UK Addendum, the data exporter may end the UK Addendum in accordance with the terms of the UK Addendum.
11. General
a. In accordance with our
Terms of Service
, you will not transfer any of your rights or obligations under these Terms to anyone else without our
prior written consent
. Transferring can include assignment, acquisition, merger, change of control, or other forms of transfer.  Any unpermitted transfer will be considered null and void.  For any permitted transfer, the new owner must follow
our instructions
before Processing Platform Data subject to these Terms.
b. You also must comply with all applicable laws and regulations (including the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“COPPA”) and the Video Privacy Protection Act (“VPPA”)).
c. If there is any conflict between these Terms and any other applicable online terms, the terms that are more restrictive on you and your App or more protective of us apply. If you have previously agreed to our Supplemental Terms for Extended Platform Products and/or our Technology Provider Amendment to Supplemental Terms for Extended Platform Products, these Terms hereby supersede and replace them.
d. We reserve the right to amend these Terms and will use commercially reasonable efforts to provide you with prior notice of any material amendments.  Your continued use of or access to Platform after any such amendment will constitute your binding agreement to these Terms as amended.
e. From time to time, we may need to modify, change, suspend, or discontinue the availability of Platform or Platform features or services, including for safety and security reasons or to otherwise protect our legitimate interests. Such modifications, changes, suspensions, or discontinuances may include, but are not limited to, imposing limits on certain features and services, restricting your access to parts or all of our APIs or websites, and discontinuing any support or modification for Platform that we have previously elected to provide for you. If we elect to discontinue the availability of the entirety of Platform, we will use commercially reasonable efforts to provide you with prior notice.
f. We do not guarantee that Platform will always be free.
g. We can issue a press release or otherwise make public statements or disclosures describing our relationship with you or your use of Platform.
h. When these Terms have ended, all rights granted to you under these Terms will immediately stop and you will immediately stop using Platform.  The following Sections will remain in effect after these Terms have ended: Section 2.b, Section 2.c, Section 3, Section 4, Section 5, Section 6, Section 7, Section 9, Section 10, Section 10A, Section 11, and Section 12.
12. Glossary
a. “App” means any technical integration with Platform or to which we have assigned an App identification number.  Any code, APIs, SDKs, tools, plugins, bots, websites, applications, specifications, and other technology made available by you or on your behalf in connection with Platform is considered part of your App.
b. "Approved Addendum" means the International Data Transfer Addendum to the Approved EU SCCs, Version B1.0, issued by the Information Commissioner under s119A of the Data Protection Act 2018 and dated 21 March 2022, as may be amended, replaced or superseded by the Information Commissioner.
c. “Audit” means a review, inspection, or audit of your and your Service Providers’ IT Systems or Records.
d. “Clauses” means the standard contractual clauses annexed to European Commission Decision (EU) 2021/914.
e. “Client” means the User of a Tech Provider’s App.
f. “Developer” means the person or entity that creates or operates an App.
g. “Developer Docs” has the meaning given in Section 1.c (“Introduction”).
h. “IT Systems” means information technology systems (real and virtual), networks, technologies, and facilities (including physical and remote access to data centers and cloud facilities) that Process Platform Data.
i. “Necessary Condition” means any of the following:
i. it is required by applicable law, rule, or regulation or otherwise required or requested by a court order or governmental authority;
ii. we suspect that you or your App have Processed Platform Data in violation of these Terms or other applicable terms or policies;
iii. you enter into a change of control transaction or transfer (or request to transfer) any of your rights or obligations under these Terms or other applicable terms or policies;
iv. we determine in our sole discretion it is necessary to ensure that you and your App have deleted Platform Data in accordance with these Terms and all other applicable terms and policies; or
v. we determine in our sole discretion it is necessary to ensure proper remediation of any non-compliance revealed by an Audit.
j. “Platform” has the meaning given in Section 1.a (“Introduction”).
k. “Platform Data” means any information, data, or other content you obtain from us, through Platform or through your App, whether directly or indirectly and whether before, on, or after the date you agree to these Terms, including data anonymized, aggregated, or derived from such data.  Platform Data includes all
Meta Product
access tokens,
app secrets
, Meta user IDs, email addresses, profile pictures and usernames.
l. “Process” means any operation or set of operations performed on data or sets of data, whether or not by automated means, including use, collection, storage, sharing, or transmission.
m. “Prohibited Practices” has the meaning given in Section 3.a (“Prohibited Practices”).
n. "Records” mean books, agreements, access logs, third-party reports, policies, processes, and other records regarding the Processing of Platform Data.
o. “Restricted Platform Data” means Platform Data that (i) reasonably can be used to identify a particular User or device; (ii) is accessed using the permissions listed
here
; or (iii) we otherwise designate as Restricted. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Restricted Platform Data does not include data that can be accessed using the permissions listed
here
.
p. “SDKs” means any object code, source code, or documentation you receive from us that helps you create Apps or content for use with the Platform.
q. “Service Provider” means an entity you use to provide you services in connection with Platform or any Platform Data.
r. “Tech Provider” means a Developer of an App whose primary purpose is to enable Users thereof to access and use Platform or Platform Data.
s. “Third-Party Auditors” has the meaning given in Section 7.b (“Regular Monitoring”).
t. “User” means the end user of an App (whether a person or an entity).
u. “Your Content” has the meaning given in Section 2.b (“Your License to Us”).
Build with Meta
AI
Meta Horizon OS
Social technologies
News
Meta for Developers
Blog
Success stories
Support
Developer support
Bug tool
Platform status
Developer community forum
Report an incident
Terms and policies
Responsible platform initiatives
Platform terms
Developer policies
Follow Us
© 2025 Meta
About
Careers
Privacy Policy
Cookies
Terms
English (US)
Bahasa Indonesia
Deutsch
Español
Español (España)
Français (France)
Italiano
Português (Brasil)
Tiếng Việt
Русский
العربية
ภาษาไทย
한국어
中文(香港)
中文(台灣)
中文(简体)
日本語
English (US)
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to help:
Provide and improve content on Meta Products
Provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook
Provide and improve Meta Products for people who have an account
For advertising and measurement services off of Meta Products, analytics, and to provide certain features and improve our services for you, we use tools from other companies on Facebook. These companies also use cookies.
You can allow the use of all cookies, just essential cookies or you can choose more options below. You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Essential cookies
These cookies are required to use Meta Products. They’re necessary for these sites to work as intended.
Optional cookies
Cookies from other companies
We use tools from
other companies
for advertising and measurement services off of Meta Products, analytics, and to provide certain features and improve our services for you. These companies also use cookies.
More information
If you allow these cookies:
We’ll be able to better personalize ads for you off of Meta Products, and measure their performance
Features on our products will not be affected
Other companies will receive information about you by using cookies
If you don’t allow these cookies:
We won’t use cookies from other companies to help personalize ads for you off of Meta Products, or to measure their performance
Some features on our products may not work
Other ways you can control your information
Manage your ad experience in Accounts Center
If you have a Facebook account, you can manage how different data is used to personalize ads with these tools.
Ad settings
To show you better ads, we use data that advertisers and other partners provide us about your activity off Meta Company Products, including websites and apps. You can control whether we use this data to show you ads in your
ad settings
.
The Meta Audience Network is a way for advertisers to show you ads in apps and websites off the
Meta Company Products
. One of the ways Audience Network shows relevant ads is by using your ad preferences to determine which ads you may be interested in seeing. You can control this in your
ad settings
.
Ad preferences
In Ad preferences, you can choose whether we show you ads and make choices about the information used to show you ads.
Off-Facebook activity
You can review your off-Facebook activity, which is a summary of activity that businesses and organizations share with us about your interactions with them, such as visiting their apps or websites. They use our
Business Tools
, such as Facebook Login or Meta Pixel, to share this information with us. This helps us do things such as give you a more personalized experience on Meta Products. Learn more about
off-Facebook activity
, how we use it, and how you can manage it.
More information about online advertising
You can opt out of seeing online interest-based ads from Meta and other participating companies through the
Digital Advertising Alliance
in the US, the
Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada
in Canada or the
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance
in Europe, or through your mobile device settings, if you are using Android, iOS 13 or an earlier version of iOS. Please note that ad blockers and tools that restrict our cookie use may interfere with these controls.
The advertising companies we work with generally use cookies and similar technologies as part of their services. To learn more about how advertisers generally use cookies and the choices they offer, you can review the following resources:
Digital Advertising Alliance
Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance
Controlling cookies with browser settings
Your browser or device may offer settings that allow you to choose whether browser cookies are set and to delete them. These controls vary by browser, and manufacturers may change both the settings they make available and how they work at any time. As of 5 October 2020, you may find additional information about the controls offered by popular browsers at the links below. Certain parts of Meta Products may not work properly if you have disabled browser cookies. Please be aware that these controls are distinct from the controls that Facebook offers.
Google Chrome
Internet Explorer
Firefox
Safari
Safari Mobile
Opera
Only allow essential cookies
Allow essential and optional cookies
Sub-policy 5
https://appodeal.com/privacy-policy/:
You control your data
We and our business partners use technologies, including cookies, to collect information about you for various purposes, including:
Functional
Statistical
Marketing
By clicking ‘Accept’, you give your consent for all these purposes. You can also choose to specify the purposes you consent to by ticking the checkbox next to the purpose and clicking ‘Save settings’.
You may withdraw your consent at any time by clicking the small icon at the bottom left corner of the website.
You can read more about how we use cookies and other technologies and how we collect and process personal data by clicking the link.
Read more about cookies
Google privacy policy
Show details
Hide details
Necessary
Strictly necessary cookies help make a website navigable by activating basic functions such as page navigation and access to secure website areas. Without these cookies, the website would not be able to work properly.
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Pending
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
Session
Name:
_cfuvid
Vendor:
.hsforms.com
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Pending
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
Session
Name:
_cfuvid
Vendor:
.hubspot.com
Service:
Vercel
Purpose:
Supports the functions of a "Content Management System" with built-in user behavior analyzes.
Privacy policy:
Vercel - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
Session
Name:
locale
Vendor:
app.appodeal.com
Service:
Cookie Information
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cookie Information - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a year
Name:
CookieInformationConsent
Vendor:
appodeal.com
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Pending
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
Session
Name:
_cfuvid
Vendor:
.highcharts.com
Functional
Functional cookies make it possible to save information that changes the way the website appears or acts. For instance your preferred language or region.
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
4 minutes
Name:
__cf_bm
Vendor:
.hubspotusercontent-na1.net
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
17 minutes
Name:
__cf_bm
Vendor:
.hs-banner.com
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
21 minutes
Name:
__cf_bm
Vendor:
.hscta.net
Service:
Microsoft
Purpose:
Supports the integration of a third-party platform on the website.
Privacy policy:
Microsoft - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a year
Name:
MSPTC
Vendor:
.bing.com
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
3 minutes
Name:
__cf_bm
Vendor:
.hsforms.net
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
17 minutes
Name:
__cf_bm
Vendor:
.hubspot.com
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
17 minutes
Name:
__cf_bm
Vendor:
.hsforms.com
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
20 minutes
Name:
__cf_bm
Vendor:
.hsadspixel.net
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
21 minutes
Name:
__cf_bm
Vendor:
.hs-analytics.net
Service:
Cloudflare
Purpose:
Supports the website's technical functions.
Privacy policy:
Cloudflare - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
17 minutes
Name:
__cf_bm
Vendor:
.hs-scripts.com
Statistical
Statistical cookies help the website owner understand how visitors interact with the website by collecting and reporting information.
Service:
Google Analytics
Purpose:
Privacy policy:
Google Analytics - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a year
Name:
_ga_xxx
Vendor:
appodeal.com
Service:
Google Analytics
Purpose:
Collects information about the users and their activity on the website for analytics and reporting purposes.
Privacy policy:
Google Analytics - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a year
Name:
_ga
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Service:
Purpose:
Expiry:
Session
Name:
countryCode
Vendor:
tenor.com
Service:
Google Analytics
Purpose:
Privacy policy:
Google Analytics - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a year
Name:
_ga_xxx
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Marketing
Marketing cookies are used to track visitors across websites. The intention is to display ads that are relevant and interesting to the individual user and thus more valuable for publishers and third-party advertisers.
Service:
Youtube, Google
Purpose:
Collects information about the users and their activity on the website through embedded video players with the purpose of delivering targeted advertising.
Privacy policy:
Youtube, Google - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
6 months
Name:
VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
Vendor:
.youtube.com
Service:
LinkedIn
Purpose:
Supports online marketing by collecting information about the users to promote products through partners and other platforms.
Privacy policy:
LinkedIn - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
6 months
Name:
li_gc
Vendor:
.linkedin.com
Service:
Microsoft, Bing
Purpose:
Identifies unique web browsers visiting Microsoft sites. These cookies are used for advertising, site analytics, and other operational purposes.
Privacy policy:
Microsoft, Bing - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a day
Name:
_uetsid
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Service:
HubSpot
Purpose:
Collects information about the users and their activity on the website. The information is used to track and analyze user behaviour and to deliver targeted advertising.
Privacy policy:
HubSpot - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
6 months
Name:
hubspotutk
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Service:
Microsoft, Bing
Purpose:
Identifies unique web browsers visiting Microsoft sites. These cookies are used for advertising, site analytics, and other operational purposes.
Privacy policy:
Microsoft, Bing - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a year
Name:
MUID
Vendor:
.bing.com
Service:
LinkedIn
Purpose:
Supports online marketing by collecting information about the users to promote products through partners and other platforms.
Privacy policy:
LinkedIn - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a day
Name:
lidc
Vendor:
.linkedin.com
Service:
Google Marketing Platform
Purpose:
Used for online marketing by collecting information about the users and their activity on the website. The information is used to target advertising to the user across different channels and devices.
Privacy policy:
Google Marketing Platform - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a year
Name:
IDE
Vendor:
.doubleclick.net
Service:
Youtube, Google
Purpose:
Supports the integration of a third-party platform on the website.
Privacy policy:
Youtube, Google - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
6 months
Name:
__Secure-ROLLOUT_TOKEN
Vendor:
.youtube.com
Service:
HubSpot
Purpose:
Collects information about the users and their activity on the website. The information is used to track and analyze user behaviour and to deliver targeted advertising.
Privacy policy:
HubSpot - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
6 months
Name:
__hstc
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Service:
HubSpot
Purpose:
Collects information about the users and their activity on the website. The information is used to track and analyze user behaviour and to deliver targeted advertising.
Privacy policy:
HubSpot - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
Session
Name:
__hssrc
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Service:
Youtube, Google
Purpose:
Collects information about the users and their activity on the website through embedded video players with the purpose of delivering targeted advertising.
Privacy policy:
Youtube, Google - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
Session
Name:
YSC
Vendor:
.youtube.com
Service:
Youtube, Google
Purpose:
Collects information about the users and their activity on the website. The Information is used to track and analyze user behavior, to meet the individual user needs and to deliver targeted advertising.
Privacy policy:
Youtube, Google - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
6 months
Name:
VISITOR_PRIVACY_METADATA
Vendor:
.youtube.com
Service:
Microsoft, Bing
Purpose:
Collects information about the users and their activity on the website. The information is used to track and analyze user behaviour and to deliver targeted advertising.
Privacy policy:
Microsoft, Bing - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a year
Name:
_uetvid
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Service:
LinkedIn
Purpose:
Supports online marketing by collecting information about the users to promote products through partners and other platforms.
Privacy policy:
LinkedIn - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
a year
Name:
bcookie
Vendor:
.linkedin.com
Service:
Facebook
Purpose:
Identifies browsers for the purposes of providing advertising and site analytics services.
Privacy policy:
Facebook - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
3 months
Name:
_fbp
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Service:
Google
Purpose:
Supports the integration of a third-party platform on the website to deliver targeted advertising.
Privacy policy:
Google - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
3 months
Name:
_gcl_au
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Service:
HubSpot
Purpose:
Collects information about the users and their activity on the website. The information is used to track and analyze user behaviour and to deliver targeted advertising.
Privacy policy:
HubSpot - Privacy policy
(opens in a new tab)
Expiry:
30 minutes
Name:
__hssc
Vendor:
.appodeal.com
Unclassified
We are in the process of classifying unclassified cookies together with the providers of the individual cookies.
Service:
Purpose:
Expiry:
an hour
Name:
cf_chl_rc_ni
Vendor:
appodeal.com
Necessary
Functional
Statistical
Marketing
Cookie policy
Your consent applies to the following domains:
appodeal.com
The cookie policy was last updated on 12.03.2025
What is a cookie?
A cookie is a small data file stored in your computer, tablet or smartphone. A cookie is not a program that can contain harmful malware or virus.
How our website uses cookies
Some cookies perform essential functions for our website. Cookies also help us get an overview of your visit to our website so we can continuously optimize and tailor the experience to your needs and interests. For example, cookies remember things like the items added to the shopping cart; whether you have visited our website before; if you are logged in; and the specific language and currency you prefer to see on the website. We also use cookies to target our ads specifically to you on other websites. In general, we use cookies as part of our service to present you with content that is as relevant to you as possible.
You can see the specific services that store cookies and why they do it, under the different categories:
Functional
Statistical
Marketing
How long are cookies stored?
The length of time a cookie is stored on your devices and browsers varies. The lifetime is calculated according to your last visit to the website. When a cookie expires, it is automatically deleted. All our cookies’ lifetimes are specified in our cookie policy.
How to block or delete cookies
You may at any time block all or just third-party cookies completely by changing the browser settings on your computer, tablet or smartphone. The location of these settings will depend on the browser you use. However, you should be aware that if you block all or just third-party cookies, there may be functions and services that you will be unable to use on the website (because these depend on cookies).
You can opt-out of cookies from Google Analytics here
.
How can you delete cookies?
It is easy to delete cookies that you have previously accepted. It depends on which browser (Chrome, Firefox, Safari, etc.) and device (smartphone, tablet, PC, Mac) you are using.
You can typically find this information under settings – Security and Privacy – but this may vary from one browser to another.  Specify which device/browser you are using (click the appropriate link):
Internet Explorer
Microsoft Edge
Mozilla Firefox
Google Chrome
Opera
Safari
Flash cookies
Apple
Android
Chrome, Android
Changing your consent
You can change your consent by either deleting cookies from your browser or by changing your original choice by clicking the link below:
You can change your consent by clicking here
Remember: If you use more than one browser, you must delete cookies in all of them.
Do you have any questions?
If you have any comments or questions relating to our information and/or processing of personal data, please feel welcome to contact us. 
The cookie policy itself is updated once a month by
Cookie Information
. If you have any questions about our cookie policy, you are welcome to
contact Cookie Information on their website.
Functional
Statistical
Marketing
Privacy Policy
1. Purpose
Appodeal, Inc., a Delaware corporation has developed this Privacy Policy (“
Policy
”) to demonstrate our commitment to protecting our users’ privacy. The terms “Appodeal,” “we,” “us”, and “our” include Appodeal, Inc. and any affiliates and subsidiaries. The terms “you” and “your” refer to any individuals and entities who use our Services or visit our Website (including our publishers, advertisers, demand partners, and other service providers) and our Employees.
This Policy describes our online and offline information practices, the kinds of information we may collect, how we intend to use that information, with whom your information may be shared, and how you can opt-out of such uses or correct or change such information. By using our Services or our Website, you agree to the practices described in this Policy. This Policy is an integral part of and is incorporated by reference into our Terms of Service (the “
Terms
”). Any capitalized terms used but not defined in this Policy will have the meaning defined in the Terms.
2. Scope
This Policy applies to any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person (“
Personal Information
”) that is collected, recorded, stored, adapted, used, or otherwise made available (collectively, “
Processed
”) by Appodeal in the course of our business providing an ad mediation platform, tools and other services (the “Services”) or the functionality of the Website. All individuals and entities whose responsibilities include Processing Personal Information on our behalf are expected to protect that data by adherence to this Policy. This Policy is intended to meet requirements globally, including those in North America, Europe, APAC, and other jurisdictions.
3. Transparency/Notice: Types of Personal Information We Collect And How We Use It
The types of Personal Information we may collect (directly from you or from Third-Party sources) and our privacy practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with Appodeal and the requirements of applicable law. Appodeal may collect Personal Information in the following ways:
You may provide Personal Information directly to Appodeal through interacting with the Services or our Website, participating in surveys, during events, and requesting products, Services, or information.
As you interact with the Services or our Website, certain passive information may also be collected about your visit, including through Technologies as described below. We endeavor to collect only that information which is relevant for the purposes of Processing. Below are the ways we collect Personal Information and how we use it.
(a) Types Of Personal Information Appodeal Collects
Appodeal collects Personal Information regarding its current, prospective, and former clients, customers, publishers, demand partners, users, visitors, guests, and Employees (collectively “
Individuals
”).
Information You Provide Directly to Us.
When you use the Services or the Website or engage in certain activities, such as registering for an account with Appodeal, requesting Services or information, or contacting us directly, we may ask you to provide some or all of the following types of information:
Account Registration.
When you register for an account to access our Services, we collect information about you which may include your name, address, telephone number, email address, and billing information such as your credit card number.
Communications with Us.
We may also collect Personal Information from you such as your name, email address, phone number or mailing address when you choose to request information about our products and Services, register for a newsletter, contact customer service, or otherwise communicate with us.
Surveys.
From time to time, we may contact you to participate in online surveys. If you do decide to participate, you may be asked to provide certain information which may include Personal Information. All information collected from your participation in our surveys is provided by you voluntarily. We may use such information to improve our products, Website and/or Services and in any manner consistent with the policies provided herein.
Automatic Data Collection.
We may collect certain information automatically through our Services, Website, or other methods of web analysis, such as your Internet protocol (IP) address, cookie identifiers, mobile advertising identifiers, and other device identifiers that are automatically assigned to your Device when you access the Internet, location data, browser type, operating system, Internet service provider, pages that you visit before and after using the Website or our Services, the date and time of your visit, the amount of time you spend on each page, information about the links you click and pages you view on our Website, and other actions taken through use of the Website or Services such as preferences.
Information from Other Sources.
We may also obtain information about you through Third-Party services and organizations to supplement information provided by you. This supplemental information allows us to verify information that you have provided to Appodeal and to enhance our ability to provide you with information about our business, products, and Services.
(b) Cookies, Pixel Tags/Web Beacons, Analytics Information, and Interest-Based Advertising
We, as well as third parties that provide content, advertising, or other functionality on our Services or Website, may use cookies, pixel tags, local storage, mobile device identifiers and other technologies (“
Technologies
”) to automatically collect information through the Services or Website. We use Technologies that are essentially small data files placed on your computer, tablet, mobile phone, or other devices (referred to collectively as a “Device”) that allow us to record certain pieces of information whenever you visit or interact with our Services, and to recognize you across Devices.
Cookies.
Cookies are bits of data stored on your Device through your browser or mobile application that allow the mobile application to remember you the next time you visit. Cookies enable smoother, more efficient use of the Website by storing your specific information and preferences such as theme, language setting, privacy preferences, and even user ID and password, so you do not need to reenter those each time you visit the Website. You may choose to block or delete cookies if your browser permits, but doing so may affect your use of the Website and your ability to access certain features of the Website.
Advertising Identifiers.
We may also use mobile advertising identifiers to recognize your device and perform the services. Depending on your device, you can chose to change or limit the transmission of your mobile advertising identifier by going into your device settings.
Web Bugs/Pixel Tags/Web Beacons.
We may also use web bugs (also called web beacons) to help us understand the behavior of our users by allowing us to track user demographics and traffic patterns.
Social Media Widgets.
Our Website includes social media features such as the Facebook “Like” button and LinkedIn (that might include widgets such as the share this button or other interactive mini-programs). These features may collect information including your IP address and which page you are visiting on our Website, and may set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. These social media features are either hosted by a third party or hosted directly on our Website. Your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policy of the company providing it.
Analytics.
We may also utilize Google Analytics and Yandex Metrics in the collection, compilation and analysis of information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on some of our Services, and to develop website content. This analytics data is not tied to any Personal Information. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt out of Google’s collection and Processing of data generated by your use of the Services by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
You can out opt of Yandex Metrics by going to
https://yandex.com/support/metrica/general/opt-out.xml
Our uses of such Technologies fall into the following general categories:
Operationally Necessary.
We may use Technologies that are necessary to the operation of our Services or Website. This includes Technologies that allow you access to our Services; or that are required to identify irregular Website behavior, prevent fraudulent activity and improve security;
Performance Related.
We may use Technologies to assess the performance of our Services or Website, including as part of our analytics practices, to help us understand how our visitors use our Website, determine if you have interacted with our messaging, determine whether you have viewed an item or link, or to improve our Services or Website;
Functionality Related.
We may use Technologies that allow us to offer you enhanced functionality when accessing or using our Services or Website. This may include identifying you when you sign into our Website or keeping track of your specified preferences, interests, or past items viewed so that we may enhance the presentation of content on our Website;
Advertising or Targeting Related.
We may use first-party or Third-Party Technologies to deliver content, including ads that may be relevant to your interests, on our Website or on Third-Party websites. This includes using Technologies to understand the usefulness to you of the advertisements and content that have been delivered to you, such as whether you have clicked on an advertisement.
We may also combine the information we collect through Technologies with other Personal Information we have collected from and about you. If you would like to opt out of the Technologies we employ through our Services, you may do so by blocking, deleting, or disabling them as your browser or Device permits.
(c) How Appodeal Uses Your Information
We acquire, hold, use, and Process Personal Information based on the legal grounds and for the legitimate business purposes outlined in this Policy, such as:
To Provide Services or Information Requested:
Appodeal may use information about you to fulfill requests for Services or information, including information about potential or future Services, including to:
Generally manage Individual information and accounts;
Respond to questions, comments, and other requests;
Provide access to certain areas, functionalities, and features of Appodeal’s Services or Website;
Allow you to register for events.
Administrative Purposes:
Appodeal may use Personal Information about you for its administrative purposes, including to:
Ensure you have a personalized and consistent experience in using the Website and Services;
Protect the security of our Service and Website
and to prevent fraud;
Measure interest in Appodeal’s Services
b and perform analytics;
Notify you of changes to the Website or Services;
Develop new Services;
Ensure internal quality control;
Verify Individual identity;
Communicate about Individual accounts and activities on Appodeal’s Services, Website and systems, and, in Appodeal’s discretion, changes to any Appodeal policy;
Send email to the email address you provide to us to verify your account and for informational and operational purposes, such as account management, customer service, or system maintenance;
Process payment for Services purchased;
Process applications and transactions;
Prevent potentially prohibited or illegal activities;
Enforce our Terms of Use.
Marketing Appodeal Services:
Appodeal may use Personal Information to provide you with materials about offers, products, and Services that may be of interest, including new content or Services. Appodeal may provide you with these materials by phone, postal mail, facsimile, or email, as permitted by applicable law. Such uses include:
To tailor content, advertisements, and offers;
To notify you about offers, products, and services that may be of interest to you;
To provide Services to you and our sponsors;
For other purposes disclosed at the time that Individuals provide Personal Information;
Otherwise with your consent.
You may contact us at any time to opt-out of the use of your Personal Information for marketing purposes, as further described in Section 6 below.
Research and Development:
Appodeal may use Personal Information to create non-identifiable information that we may use alone or in the aggregate with information obtained from other sources, in order to help us improve our Website, to optimally deliver our existing Services or develop new Services. From time to time, Appodeal may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage Third-Party service providers to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve Individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the Services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Services or our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns, and/or promotional activities. If an Individual participates in a survey, the information given will be used along with that of other study participants. We may share anonymous Individual and aggregate data for research and analysis purposes.
Direct Mail, Email and Outbound Telemarketing:
Individuals who provide us with Personal Information, or whose Personal Information we obtain from Third Parties, may receive periodic emails, newsletters, mailings, or phone calls from us with information on Appodeal’s or our business partners’ products and services or upcoming special offers/events we believe may be of interest. We offer the option to decline these communications at no cost to the Individual by following the instructions in Section 6 below.
Mobile Devices:
Appodeal provides Services that are specifically designed to be compatible and used on mobile Devices. Appodeal will collect certain information that your mobile Device sends when you use such Services, like a GPS location, user settings and the operating system of your Device. Appodeal’s Services require that users log in with an account, and information collected through mobile versions of the Services is associated with user accounts. In addition, Appodeal may enable Individuals to download an application, widget, or other tool that can be used on Devices. Some of these tools may store information on Devices. These tools may transmit Personal Information to Appodeal to enable Individuals to access user accounts and to enable Appodeal to track use of these tools. Some of these tools may enable users to email reports and other information from the tool. Appodeal may use personal or non-identifiable information transmitted to Appodeal to enhance these tools, to develop new tools, for quality improvement and as otherwise described in this Policy or in other notices Appodeal provides.
Anonymous and Aggregated Information:
Appodeal may use Personal Information and other information about you to create anonymized and aggregated information, such as de-identified demographic information, de-identified location information, information about the Device from which you access Appodeal’s Services or Website, or other analyses we create. Anonymized and aggregated information is used for a variety of functions, including the measurement of visitors’ interest in and use of various portions or features of the Services or Website. Anonymized or aggregated information is not Personal Information, and Appodeal may use such information in a number of ways, including research, internal analysis, analytics, and any other legally permissible purposes. We may share this information within Appodeal and with Third Parties for our or their purposes in an anonymized or aggregated form that is designed to prevent anyone from identifying you.
Sharing Content with Friends or Colleagues:
Appodeal’s Services may offer various tools and functionality. For example, Appodeal may provide functionality on its Services that will allow you to forward or share certain content with a friend or colleague. Email addresses that you may provide for a friend or colleague will be used to send your friend or colleague the content or link you request, but will not be collected or otherwise used by Appodeal or any other Third Parties for any other purpose.
Other Uses:
Appodeal may use Personal Information for other purposes for which we have a legitimate interest, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, anti-fraud protection, or any other purpose disclosed to you at the time you provide Personal Information or with your consent.
(d) Third-Party Websites and Social Media Platforms
The Website may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website or other Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by us, and Appodeal does not endorse or make any representations about Third-Party websites or social media platforms. We encourage our users to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that they interact with. We do not endorse, screen or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
The Website and our Services may also contains links and interactive features with various social media platforms. If you already use these platforms, their cookies may be set on your Device when using our Website or Services. You should be aware that Personal Information which you voluntarily include and transmit online in a publicly accessible blog, chat room, social media platform or otherwise online, or that you share in an open forum may be viewed and used by others without any restrictions. We are unable to control such uses of your information when interacting with a social media platform, and by using such services you assume the risk that the Personal Information provided by you may be viewed and used by third parties for any number of purposes.
(e) Software Development Kit
To provide our Services, we offer a software development kit (“SDK”) which allows us to access your Mobile Properties. We may collect Personal Information about users of your Mobile Properties through our SDK, including IP addresses, mobile advertising IDs, GPS location (if appropriate permission is given), application usage statistics such as launch times and duration, ad views and click-throughs. Advertisers or demand partners that provide content through our SDK may also collect Personal Information or other information about your users through our SDK. You agree that, in order to use our SDK, you will obtain appropriate consent from your users for the collection, use and sharing of Personal Information through our SDK, and that you will maintain and process all user data in accordance with your privacy policy and all applicable laws in any country in which your Mobile Properties are distributed or used and users are located.
If you use our SDK as a publisher, you agree that we may also share certain non-personal information about your use of the SDK through your Mobile Properties with advertisers and demand partners who provide content through our SDK. Such information may include the number of requests you receive for ad placements on your Mobile Properties, the number of impressions and click-throughs generated, information about revenue you receive, and eCPM data.
4. Human Resources Data
Appodeal collects Personal Information from Employees, their contact points in case of a medical emergency, and beneficiaries under any insurance policy (“
Human Resources Data
”). “Employees” include current, temporary, permanent, prospective or former employees, directors, contractors, workers, or retirees of Appodeal. The Human Resources Data we collect may include title, name, address, phone number, email address, date of birth, passport number, driver’s license number, Social Security number or other government-issued identification number, financial information related to credit checks, bank details for payroll, information that may be recorded on a CV or application form, language abilities, contact information of third parties in case of an emergency and beneficiaries under any insurance policy. We may also collect sensitive Human Resources Data such as details of health and disability, including mental health, medical leave, and maternity leave; and information about national origin or immigration status.
We acquire, hold, use and Process Human Resources-related Personal Information for a variety of business purposes including:
Workflow management, including assigning, managing and administering projects;
Human Resources administration and communication;
Payroll and the provision of benefits;
Compensation, including bonuses and long-term incentive administration, stock plan administration, compensation analysis, including monitoring overtime and compliance with labor laws, and company recognition programs;
Job grading activities;
Performance and employee development management;
Organizational development and succession planning;
Benefits and personnel administration;
Absence management;
Helpdesk and IT support services;
Regulatory compliance;
Internal and/or external or governmental compliance investigations;
Internal or external audits;
Litigation evaluation, prosecution, and defense;
Diversity and inclusion initiatives;
Restructuring and relocation;
Emergency contacts and services;
Employee safety;
Compliance with statutory requirements;
Processing of Employee expenses and travel charges;
Acquisitions, divestitures, and integrations.
5. Onward Transfer—Appodeal May Disclose Your Information
(a) Information We Share
We may share your information as described in this Policy (e.g., with our Third-Party service providers; to comply with legal obligations; to protect and defend our rights and property) or with your permission. The complete Third-Party service provider list can be found here:
www.appodeal.com/home/partners-privacy-policies/
We Use Vendors and Service Providers.
We may share any information we receive with vendors and service providers, including advertisers that provide content through our SDK. The types of service providers (processors) to whom we entrust Personal Information include service providers for: (i) provision of IT and related services, such as web hosting or data management; (ii) provision of information and services you have requested; (iii) payment processing; and (iv) customer service activities; and (v) in connection with the provision of the Website. Appodeal has executed appropriate contracts with the service providers that prohibit them from using or sharing Personal Information except as necessary to perform the contracted services on our behalf or to comply with applicable legal requirements.
Business Partners.
We may choose to share Personal Information with our business partners and affiliates for our and our affiliates’ internal business purposes, or to provide you with Services that you have requested. Appodeal may also provide Personal Information to business partners with whom we may jointly offer products or services, or whose products or services we believe may be of interest to you. In such cases, our business partner’s name will appear, along with Appodeal’s. Appodeal requires our affiliates and business partners to agree in writing to maintain the confidentiality and security of Personal Information they maintain on our behalf and not to use it for any purpose other than the purpose for which Appodeal provided it to them.
Interest-Based Advertising and Third Party Marketing.
Through our Services, Appodeal may allow Third-Party advertising partners to set tracking tools (e.g., cookies or other Technologies) to collect information regarding your activities (e.g., your IP address, page(s) visited, time of day). We may also share such de-identified information as well as selected Personal Information (such as demographic information and past purchase history) we have collected with Third-Party advertising partners. These advertising partners may use this information (and similar information collected from other websites) for purposes of delivering targeted advertisements to you when you visit non-Appodeal related websites within their networks. This practice is commonly referred to as “interest-based advertising” or “online behavioral advertising. We may allow access to other data collected by the Website to facilitate transmittal of information that may be useful, relevant, valuable or otherwise of interest to you. If you prefer that we do not share your Personal Information with Third-Party advertising partners, you may opt-out of such sharing at no cost by following the instructions in Section 6 below.
Disclosures to Protect Us or Others (e.g., As Required by Law and Similar Disclosures).
We may access, preserve, and disclose your Personal Information, other account information, and content if we believe doing so is required or appropriate to: (i) comply with law enforcement or national security requests and legal process, such as a court order or subpoena; (ii) respond to your requests; (iii) protect yours’, ours’ or others’ rights, property, or safety; (iv) to enforce Appodeal policies or contracts; (v) to collect amounts owed to Appodeal; (vi) when we believe disclosure is necessary or appropriate to prevent physical harm or financial loss or in connection with an investigation or prosecution of suspected or actual illegal activity; or (vii) if we, in good faith, believe that disclosure is otherwise necessary or advisable.
In addition, from time to time, server logs may be reviewed for security purposes—e.g., to detect unauthorized activity on the Services. In such cases, server log data containing IP addresses may be shared with law enforcement bodies in order that they may identify users in connection with their investigation of the unauthorized activities.
Merger, Sale, or Other Asset Transfers.
If we are involved in a merger, acquisition, financing due diligence, reorganization, bankruptcy, receivership, sale of company assets, or transition of service to another provider, then your information may be sold or transferred as part of such a transaction as permitted by law and/or contract. Should such an event occur, Appodeal will endeavor to direct the transferee to use Personal Information in a manner that is consistent with the Policy in effect at the time such Personal Information was collected.
(b) Data Transfers
All Personal Information collected via or by Appodeal may be stored anywhere in the world, including but not limited to, in the United States, in the cloud, on our servers, on the servers of our affiliates or the servers of our service providers. Your Personal Information may be accessible to law enforcement or other authorities pursuant to a lawful request. By providing information to Appodeal, you consent to the storage of your Personal Information in these locations.
6. Choice/Modalities to Opt-Out
(a) General
You have the right to opt out of certain uses and disclosures of your Personal Information. Where you have consented to Appodeal’s Processing of your Personal Information or sensitive Personal Information, you may withdraw that consent at any time and opt-out to further Processing by following the instructions in this Section. Even if you opt-out, we may still collect and use non-Personal Information regarding your activities on our Website and/or information from the advertisements on Third-Party websites for non-interest based advertising purposes, such as to determine the effectiveness of the advertisements.
(b) Email and Telephone Communications
If you receive an unwanted email from us, you can use the unsubscribe link found at the bottom of the email to opt-out of receiving future emails. We will process your request within a reasonable time after receipt. Note that you will continue to receive transaction-related emails regarding products or services you have requested. We may also send you certain communications regarding Appodeal and our Services and you will not be able to opt out of those communications (e.g., communications regarding updates to our Terms or this Policy).
We maintain telephone “do-not-call” and “do-not-mail” lists as mandated by law. We process requests to be placed on do-not-mail, do-not-phone and do-not-contact lists within 60 days after receipt, or such shorter time as may be required by law.
(c) Human Resources Data
With regard to Personal Information that Appodeal receives in connection with the employment relationship, Appodeal will use such Personal Information only for employment-related purposes as more fully described above. If Appodeal intends to use this Personal Information for any other purpose, Appodeal will notify the Individual and provide an opportunity to opt-out of such uses.
(d) Do Not Track
Do Not Track (“DNT”) is a privacy preference that users can set in certain web browsers. DNT is a way for users to inform websites and services that they do not want certain information about their webpage visits collected over time and across websites or online services. Please note that we do not respond to or honor DNT signals or similar mechanisms transmitted by web browsers.
(e) Cookies and Interest-Based Advertising
We hope that you find the display of interest-based Ads valuable. However, if you wish to opt-out of these advertising services, you can edit your preferences by visiting the “Settings” page of the Website and selecting the option to opt-out.
As noted above, you may stop or restrict the placement of cookies on your Devices or remove them from your browser by adjusting your web browser preferences. Please note that cookie-based opt-outs are not effective on mobile applications. However, on many mobile Devices, application users may opt out of certain mobile ads via their Device settings or by downloading the AppChoices mobile application offered by the Digital Advertising Alliance.
The online advertising industry also provides websites from which you may opt-out of receiving targeted ads from our data partners and our other advertising partners that participate in self-regulatory programs. You can access these, and also learn more about targeted advertising and consumer choice and privacy, at
networkadvertising.org/managing/opt_out.asp
, or
www.youronlinechoices.eu
and
www.aboutads.info/choices/
. You can also choose not to be included in Google Analytics by following this link:
tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
To be clear, whether you are using our opt-out found at
www.appodeal.com/home/sdk-opt-out
and/or an online industry opt-out, these cookie-based opt-outs must be performed on each Device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt-out will not be effective on your mobile Device. You must separately opt-out on each Device. Advertisements on Third-Party websites that contain the AdChoices link and that link to this Privacy Policy may have been directed to you based on anonymous, non-Personal Information collected by advertising partners over time and across websites. These advertisements provide a mechanism to opt-out of the advertising partners’ use of this information for interest-based advertising purposes.
7. SECURITY OF Your INFORMATION
The security of your Personal Information is important to us. We maintain appropriate safeguards and current security standards to protect your Personal Information from unauthorized access, disclosure, or misuse, such as using SSL encryption. However, no system can be completely secure, and we cannot ensure or warrant the security of any information you provide to us. While we take meaningful steps to secure your information, we do not promise, and you should not expect, that your Personal Information will always remain secure. We do not accept liability for unintentional disclosure.
By using the Website or providing Personal Information to us, you agree that we may communicate with you electronically regarding security, privacy, and administrative issues relating to your use of the Website. If we learn of a security system’s breach, we may attempt to notify you electronically by posting a notice on the Website or sending an e-mail to you. You may have a legal right to receive this notice in writing.
8. Rights of Access, Rectification, Erasure, and Restriction
You can review and change certain Personal Information related to your use of our Website or Services (such as your name and contact information). To access your information, simply sign in to your account and you will be able to edit your Personal Information.
You may inquire as to whether Appodeal is Processing Personal Information about you, request access to Personal Information, and ask that we correct, amend or delete your Personal Information where it is inaccurate. Where otherwise permitted by applicable law, you may send an e-mail to legal@appodeal.com or use any of the methods set out in this Policy to request access to, receive (port), restrict Processing, seek rectification, or request erasure of Personal Information held about you by Appodeal. Such requests will be processed in line with local laws.
| Although Appodeal makes good faith efforts to provide Individuals with access to their Personal Information, there may be circumstances in which Appodeal is unable to provide access, including but not limited to: where the information contains legal privilege, would compromise others’ privacy or other legitimate rights, where the burden or expense of providing access would be disproportionate to the risks to the Individual’s privacy in the case in question or where it is commercially proprietary. If Appodeal determines that access should be restricted in any particular instance, we will provide you with an explanation of why that determination has been made and a contact point for any further inquiries. To protect your privacy, Appodeal will take commercially reasonable steps to verify your identity before granting access to or making any changes to your Personal Information.
9. Retention
Appodeal retains the Personal Information we receive as described in this Policy for as long as you use our Services or as necessary to fulfill the purpose(s) for which it was collected, provide our Services, resolve disputes, establish legal defenses, conduct audits, pursue legitimate business purposes, enforce our agreements, and comply with applicable laws.
10. CHILDREN’S PRIVACY
The Website is restricted to individuals over the age of 18. We do not knowingly collect, maintain, or use Personal Information from children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16) years of age, and no part of the Website is directed to children under the age of 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16). If you learn that your child has provided us with Personal Information without your consent, you may alert us at legal@appodeal.com. If we learn that we have collected any Personal Information from children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), we will promptly take steps to delete such information and terminate the child’s account.
11. International Users
By using the Website, you will transfer data to the United States. If you are visiting from the European Union or other regions with laws governing data collection and use, please note that you are agreeing to the transfer of your information to the United States and processing globally. By providing your Personal Information, you consent to any transfer and processing in accordance with this Policy.
12. REDRESS/COMPLIANCE AND ACCOUNTABILITY
Questions or concerns regarding our compliance with this Policy may be directed to
legal@appodeal.com
or contact us at:
Appodeal, Inc.
575 Market St, 5th Floor
San Francisco, CA 94105, USA
Appodeal will address your concerns and attempt to resolve any privacy issues in a timely manner.
If you are an EU citizen and feel that Appodeal is not abiding by the terms of this Privacy Policy, please contact us at the contact information provided above. If any request remains unresolved, you may contact the national data protection authority for your EU Member State.
13. OTHER RIGHTS AND IMPORTANT INFORMATION
(a) CHANGES TO OUR PRIVACY POLICY AND PRACTICES
Revision to the Privacy Policy.
We may revise this Privacy Policy in our sole discretion, so review it periodically. If you continue to visit this Website or use our Services after such changes have been made, you hereby provide your consent to the changes.
Posting of Revised Privacy Policy.
If there are any material changes to this Policy, Appodeal will notify you by email or as otherwise required by applicable law. We will post any adjustments to the Privacy Policy on this web page, and the revised version will be effective immediately when it is posted (or upon notice as applicable). If you are concerned about how your information is used, bookmark this page and read this Privacy Policy periodically.
New Uses of Personal Information.
Additionally, before we use Personal Information for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will endeavor to provide information regarding the new purpose and give you the opportunity to opt-out. Where consent of the Individual for the Processing of Personal Information is otherwise required by law or contract, Appodeal will endeavor to comply with the law or contract.
CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS
California law permits users who are California residents to request and obtain from us once a year, free of charge, a list of the Third Parties to whom we have disclosed their Personal Information (if any) for their direct marketing purposes in the prior calendar year, as well as the type of Personal Information disclosed to those parties. Appodeal does not share Personal Information with Third Parties for their own marketing purposes.
The last update to our Privacy Policy was posted on May 3, 2018.